The problem with hats is that most of them look ridiculous; for those brave enough to wear a hat in public, they're a great way to keep cool and block the sun.
I know, I know. Terrible idea, right? But this really is just a natural progression for us. You see, the two of us have a saying: We shall only embark on a dream if it's widely considered to be a terrible idea. Last year, I was a shooting instructor for the blind. The year before that, Kristy worked as the hot-tub cleaner at the Jersey Shore mansion. And the year before that, I was a bull-fighter.
Actually, I think one possible factor that feeds dissatisfaction of one's own dance is actually a good thing. That factor is consistency. This is the basis of any useful language. A "tree" is always a tree, and whenever the word is used it evokes the same understanding. And so is a lead always a lead and communication between you and your partner need not be encumbered by uncertainty. Of course, it is the innate creative drive that pushes us to seek new manners of expression. This inspiration, in our best moments, is what makes us poets on the floor.
HE WILL PUT THEM OUT.
■ Reduce wobbly bits without a crash diet
Evolution is a car that can truly carry a family publication what the mitsubishi lancer supercharger but if styling counts for anything, the mitsubishi lancer 2002 es at the mitsubishi lancer wrc05 a lovely set of black 18-inch rims. All-in-all it's a small Mitsubishi? I may be a diesel were largely outweighed by the mitsubishi lancer 2002 es as `the new Mitsubishi' - and it should have plenty of grunt to cope with its extra capacity. Go for the less well specified versions and the Mercedes-Benz C 63 AMG operating in an F1 racer. They did it in the FIA World Rally Championships and the mitsubishi lancer pic but nothing with some of the mitsubishi lancer 2002 es to the mainstream family hatchbacks it's targeting but purely on a value for money basis, the Mitsubishi Colt DI-D comes across as a good bit behind mainstream offerings.
flowers from Prima
I travel a bit here and there but I can only imagine the really frequent flyers and how they would have probably rolled their eyes at this lady. I just smiled!
The MemmoFoundation in Palazzo Ruspoli, Via Del Corso. Through February 1, 2009.If there is any city that can make you believe in ghosts, that is, in the continuity of spiritual existence after death, it would have to be Rome. Besides the remarkable antiquity everywhere, of a city with roots back to 753 BCE (although historians believe it may have been closer to 625 BCE), ancient structures and fragments of structures, there are physical relics of Saints and Popes and Clergy everywhere, literally mounted on the walls or under the altars of churches (chiese), dating back to the Renaissance and earlier. There is even a "Museum of the Souls in Purgatory" on the lungo Tevere, containing objects or photos of objects that show "tangible traces" of apparitions made by various souls in Purgatory to those left behind on earth, including hand or fingerprints on book pages, wooden boards or articles of clothing from Belgium, France, Germany and Italy.
For the Dough:
As you prepare your home, your family, yourself for the coming of the Christ Child,
D – ‘Cycling Networks & New Media’
Vincenti M, Rovesti S, Bergoni M, Calzolari E, Candela S, Campagna A, et al. Risk of birth defects in a population exposed to environmental lead. Sci Total Environ 2001; 278: 23-30.
It is a cliché to say that they fear the truth, however, it is also a fact. They fear the truth because the truth would get in the way of the project (or Common Purpose), if the public knew the truth they might be less willing to accept the lies, and that would not suit the purposes of those who control our destiny. This very fact alone exposes their plan for what it is, if to succeed in their aims they must hide the truth from us, then their aims can not be in our best interests, and they know it.
We had a pretty boring week but a pretty busy weekend.
on the home front, we have 3 new baby chickens that keep us entertained daily--they're adorable and hilarious to watch. judson pulls up a stool next to their box, and just watches and talks to them...too cute! judson's ready to be out for the summer, and i'm excited to have him home more, though i hate to see his kindergarden year come to an end. it's been so much fun to watch him and his friends figure out what this "school thing" is all about--6 is such a fun age!
I am used to being discriminated against a fatty and unfashionable girl with scarf. Those types of girls who wear miniskirts and tube tops, slip a box of cigarettes in their pockets, sit on the laps of their boyfriends’, dye their hairs colorfully, drink and smoke a shisha – are all known for their arrogance, conceitedness and poshness.
Have you ever been blessed with a miracle?
Tips to help them stretch a little further, how to layer, ways to make them pop fom your lay outs.
Antisemitism has existed for millennia throughout the world. Originally manifested under a religious guise and then a racial one, in recent years much anti-Jewish animus has been manifested under the political/ideological guise of anti-Zionism. This is particularly true on American college and university campuses, where political “criticism” of Israel often morphs into the recognizable tropes of classical antisemitism, such as claims that Jews are baby killers and the portrayal of Jews as hungry for world domination.
So just as this commie successfully fused anti-Semitism with a seemingly bona fide anti-capitalism (bona fide to leftists), so the SWP successfully fuses anti-Semitism with, well, anti-Zionism. That is, they pretend that their anti-Semitism is in fact only anti-Zionism, despite the hundreds of coincidences and bits of evidence which point to the fact that this is pure bullshit on their part.
Femal Hiker: "Yeah."
I started by writing a superhero story. I always wanted to do a story with some sort of superhero as the main character - turning that graphic novel/comic book staple into a novel length treatment. But I didn’t want it to be fan fic; I wanted my own hero. I started with some sort of alien trapped on Earth, then a mutant, but the fact that both these have been done to death and anything I come up with would be just cliché after cliché made me look in a different direction.
Sugar meets the same criteria for regulation as alcohol, the authors wrote, because it’s unavoidable, there’s potential for abuse, it’s toxic, and it negatively impacts society. They write that sugar is added to so many processed foods that it’s everywhere, and people eat up to 500 calories per day in added sugar alone. Sugar acts on the same areas of the brain as alcohol and tobacco to encourage subsequent intake, they wrote, and it’s toxic because research shows that sugar increases disease risk from factors other than added calories, such as when it disrupts metabolism…
But I also treasure Marie, 80, on my floor. She’s still married. She wears an immaculate bouffant pompadour hairdo, dresses with style and had a male stripper for her 80th. I asked her in the elevator one day — she’s OK with this sort of directeness — “How old are you, anyway?” I thought, maybe, late 60s.
The first 6 issues of The Dungeoneer from back in the day each had a featured dungeon. Each of these were great examples of Judges Guild’s wild and wooly take on Dungeons and Dragons. For one thing, the entries for rooms and areas were just like I did mine in my game notebooks, specifically, poor spelling, grammer, and amusing misuse of words. A lot of the time, you could barely grasp what the author (usually the great Paul Jaquays) was getting at in some of the entries, just like one of my players might find my notebook jots to be if they snuck a glimpse. This stuff was so very amateurish, and for sure that was a good thing. It was one of the charms of the stuff; it was written the way I wrote for my games, and how could that not appeal to me? It was homey and warm, and you automatically felt like the author was your buddy, a regular guy in a way Sir Gary never could came off in his flowery prose.
So, I must run and get all pretty like!
Gerrymandering and malapportionment have been serious issues for decades, and were exacerbated after the 1969 racial riots. What makes the ‘old’ issues more salient is the competitiveness of the upcoming polls, as these factors have been shown to influence outcomes in the past.
Sorry for the quietness on the blog-front this week - it's been the first week of school holidays and I've been sorting out stuff in our house which has gotten just a tad crazy in the last term (or more!!). Nothing like a bit of sorting and culling to make the place feel a bit better!
I always got a book in my stocking as a kid. I still put at least one book in everyone's stocking every year. Be creative with the choice of books, though. An more expensive magazine that the recipient loves but doesn't often buy themselves (like National Geographic or Vanity Fair). Crossword puzzle books if you know the person enjoys them. Last year there was a Farmers' Almanac in mine, which might sound odd but was actually a gift I kept going back to over and over again.
Add the ground coconut to the pearl onions and cook till it boils.
I found this claim rather extraordinary coming from a Catholic, althemoreso that no one on Fisheaters voiced opposition or disagreement. I had, obviously quite wrongly, thought that such rhetoric was reserved to the Protestants and that Catholics took it as "read" that priests and religious are anything but parasites. Interesting that the commentator used the phrase "social parasite" -- was this intended to suggest that suggest that the clergy add nothing to the social life of a community and only suck the life from it?
The Alzheimer’s Association-Greater Illinois Chapter is pleased offer a free online resource, Encouraging Comfort Care: A Guide for Families of People with Dementia Living in Care Facilities. This 21-page booklet provides useful information to families and staff of long-term care facilities about Alzheimer’s disease and related dementias, particularly care issues related to the late and final stages.
That inspired me to get writing again. Frankly, when I retweeted the tweet, I did not see the word “abort” in there. I was responding to the message to leave women to make their own choices. This is the majority of our discussion. I’m sure I’m missing a couple of tweets, but you get the gist:
We got to the theatre at 7:00 to check out if the lines were starting. If they weren't we were going to kill some time walking around the mall. That didn't work out because when we walked in there was probably about thirty people already in line, so we grabbed our spot. Yay!!
This is often a mistake made by new business start-ups who in the heat of battle forget that the experience they create for their customers is the most impressionable and lasting investments they can make.
They even used a couple of quotes in the show that we were pretty sure were actually from Revelation. So, our interest piqued by the show, we pulled out Emi's bible (the story of which is mentioned here), and started reading The Book of Revelation. Man, is that one trippy story. But very interesting (and Emi is very good at reading dramatically aloud)! As well as being entertaining, it says a lot about the culture of the time.
1/4 tsp onion powder
They think us Crazy.
Right - that's all you get for tonight. Night night, all. See you tomorrow.
That’s the question my heart is asking. Where do we go from here God? You know my desire. You know the desire of my husband’s heart. Even though Ella has not voiced wanting a sibling, (which I am so thankful for) you know she desires that, if not now, in the future she will want that.
A friend of mine who spent 40 years with RBS lost his job Sunday as the direct result of Freddie G’s deluded schemes. I imagine he’d appreciate receiving just a small portion of the man’s pension.
We start with a basic rhythm...not much different than what we have been doing all summer. We decide to spend some time creating art-journals and playing lots of Chinese Checkers and Dominoes to get to know eachother better.
I nodded and we both walked out of the studio.
The Mongaup is a class II+ dam-released river in New York from the Rio Dam to the Delaware River. The river is about 2 and a half miles and starts just below the dam (which can release 1 barrel or both barrels) with a pretty good play wave. A lot of people like to stay on this wave and surf/ warm up. After that is another 100 yard rapid ending with a big eddy on river left to pick up gear should someone swim. The eddy is great for practicing some strokes and ferrying, catching eddies and getting into the current.
Yeah, probably.
(1) That Paddy’s main motivation is his dealings with his shareholding in the Maybourne hotels was to secure secret side deals or “disguised consideration” for his shares. It was suggested that Paddy had worked out a deal with Middle Eastern investors which would pay Paddy GBP 5m (€6m) per annum for 3-5 years and that this was going straight into Paddy’s pocket. It was also suggested Paddy was negotiating a side deal with the Middle Easterners – Qataris in fact – which would see him get a percentage in any uplift in the value of the hotel group based on independent valuations every five years. Paddy denied the former accusation saying that any payment was for project management of the €200m redevelopment of Claridges and the Berkeley hotels, and that Paddy would only receive his expenses and Paddy denied the second deal, saying it never made it as a feasible option. It was further suggested that Paddy supported an investment deal by the Qataris which was worth GBP 875-900m to Maybourne and which would require due diligence at a time when the Barclay brothers were seemingly offering GBP 900m without requiring due diligence and warranties. It was suggested that the Barclay brothers’ deal was superior in value and absence of strings attached, whereas the Qatari deal was potentially worth less and did have strings attached. The implication was that Paddy was supporting the Qatari deal so as to secretly feather his own nest.
The organisms that eat small amounts of blood, much like mosquitoes do. For lice, wash Clothing in hot water is necessary prior to drying at high temperature. So simply, what are the bugs? Lice are small parasites that attach themselves Oviparous scalp and supply on blood of its host to survive. Do not rinse it, but take a shower cap and sat on his head for 30 minutes anyway.
He put his arm around my shoulder and I caught a glimpse of something sparkly out of the corner of my eye (see picture to the above). At the same time, I could feel his heart race. I was confused. She took the picture. Steven bent down like he was tying his shoe. As the words, “What are you doing?” come out of my mouth, he held up a beautiful ring, told me he wanted to spend his life with me and asked the four words I’d been dying to hear, “Will you marry me?”
I’ve always enjoyed looking at the way the western evolved over the years. There’s a, fairly common, misconception that the spaghetti western just kind of exploded onto the scene in a genre busting blaze of immorality and violence. However, that’s a superficial reading of things; the foundations were being laid a decade before and the progression isn’t that hard to follow. Anyway, the consensus seems to hold that the spaghettis gave the traditional western a much needed jolt to shake it out of the doldrums it was in danger of slipping into. That’s hard to argue with, but I’m not sure the Hollywood western wasn’t heading in more or less the same direction of its own accord regardless of outside pressure. When you look at some examples of genre pieces from the mid-60s there are already indications of their straddling the two, seemingly irreconcilable, eras. Rio Conchos (1964) makes for interesting viewing in this context, having the trappings and look of the traditional oater but displaying an attitude and sensibility closer to the emerging European westerns.
First set of 3 was done at 135# and I got the same warning. I did two sets of three at 185#. They felt ok. Felt like I was back more often than forward, but there was still a tendency to lean. It took a while to tease out what was going on, but I finally figured it out. It’s the left wrist.
Q: You are an ex-pat. How has that had an influence on your writing? Or has it? How do you balance writing and being a wife and mother? What's your schedule like? How do you keep your writing time sacred? Or do you?
Anyway, it's friday night and its Red Nose Day! So I'm going to join in the festivities.
He made sure I always had an air conditioner in working order when I stayed at the farm.
Marketing and Mothers possible benefits to Nintendo’s image
Hope that's the best bath of your life, Marat Ken. Godspeed.
These among other acts of economic sabotage identified by the committee all add up to show that corruption has become official in the transaction of government business.
じゃね～
Our first webinar offered a quick refresher around the Types of Work Model; where it came from, what it is and, crucially, how it can be applied in a variety of situations.
I have made a couple more Farmers Wife blocks, and have a question for you on them. For the first couple I have used a crisp cream (which reads white against the blue and drown) and I'm liking the modern feel it gives these blocks. For the last couple of blocks I did not.
I crept slowly towards the corner. I could see the pale earth around the remains of the road. I caught sight of the hole, and had to step back as I experienced a dizziness I’ve never felt before.
1/2 pound bacon
I'm enjoying writing something about not writing. How twisted.
That leads me to today - Monday. The last day before I go back to work. Blech. But I was happy to see one bubble envelope with my name on it in the mailbox.
I had just sent the kids upstairs to start on their jobs.
Yesterday we went grocery shopping and with coupons and in-store discounts, got our total from $209 to $132! That's 2 weeks of groceries, we will just have to pick up more almond milk, fresh fruit and probably eggs and bread-oh, and dog food. I can't seem to buy enough of any of that for a full 2 weeks.
Where was the place that you had your first epiphany beer, that is, a beer that was more than just a fizzy yellow refreshing beverage for you?
The Welsh Government's 2012-2013 Draft Budget, published today by Labour finance minister Jane Hutt, is the second one in a row to cut Welsh public services. 12.2% cuts to education, 3% cuts to the NHS and an average of 6% cuts to environment, housing, fire services and elsewhere across the public sector promise to make Welsh residents less healthy, less safe, and less financially secure over the coming year while hurting social mobility and wasting resources.
She had a visitor recently and although the woman seemed absolutely lovely there was just . . . something . . . that didn’t sit right. So Patricia, with her usual down played intelligence and beyond the norm street smartz, tricked the woman into giving her a last name after the chick called a second and third time asking for help finding employment.
Hey, it's another unnecessary boondoggle pushed for by Bloomberg and the EDC! You know what that means. Actually, this one is wasting time and money because Jerrold Nadler accepted tens of thousands of dollars from lobbyists for the railroad industry and because it benefits the communities he represents in Manhattan. Maybe the talking heads who are so concerned about the effects of increasing truck traffic - which their own study says will increase even more WITH the tunnel - can explain how we're going to pay for this when we have no money for any other rail project in the foreseeable future.
Then I said to Courtney, “Just sing.“
this endless morning made my
In the sunlight of love.
So, when you get registered, you can ask for a listing by state and then vote for the Community Food Bank in Marana, Arizona.
Can you tell that I attacked my lack of color problem HEAD ON? I went from having no color in my closet to owning TWO pairs of colored pants, LOADS of coral/tangerine tones, and multiple colored cardigans. I may procrastinate when it comes to washing the pile of dishes in our sink, organizing the pantry, taking out the trash, weeding the garden… Okay, so I tend to procrastinate with quite a few things… But when I notice a deficit in my closet, I sure am quick to remedy it!
We all sat, stood or knelt on the floor of the cramped hospital room at one time or another. We came and went in shifts throughout the day, hoping he’d be awake, trying to spend as much time as possible with him. We all knew the end was a short time away, as did he.
"Well, the next time you see him, tell him his long-lost cousin says 'hi', I said with a matching grin.
Example: Mark May: “They need to add four more BCS games and have all of those slots go to the Mountain West, and they need to do it now!” You: “I’m sorry, Mark, but giving everyone an equal part when they’re clearly not equal is called what again, class? ‘Communism’!”
As explained the main benefit is the packaging of these units. Typically Linear dampers are operated by rockers and the dampers are then either laid across the top of the gearbox or sit vertically (requiring a recess in the top of the gearbox case). Either option carries complications in the cars structure or aero. With a Rotary damper the unit forms both the rocker and the damper and takes up far less volume.
On the market - By no means as easily available as it merits. But then again, it's a tricky beer to market, what with it's junior-sized bottle visibly yearning for a multipack and looking too insubstantial on it's own. There goes my old bugbear issue again...
SCIENCES
It also represents the span of the ocean as we have seen it up until fairly recently – an expanse that stretches beyond the horizon to the ends of the earth. This has been replaced by outer space in our imagination, which will be addressed below. Despite its dangerous aspect, water is necessary for life (as we know it). Without life, there is no death, after all.
A very happening 2012 trend is the illusion neckline. I for one love the look of sheer necklines and sleeves and am planning on adding a least five more of these dresses to the collection over the next few months. Popularized in the 1950s this style allowed modesty as well as showing some skin, albeit opaque but sexy and demure. These days illusion is found in a few varieties of sheer fabric: tulle, power netting, organza and chiffon to name a few. Designers are using softer and stretchier fibers for the max in comfort . . .
We have some sad news Monique and Marga are both leaving us, Monique has her own B&B and is so buzy with it now the new season is here and Marga is buzy with other great things and she also decided to leave us. It is so sad that you are leaving us girls, but we wish you all the luck in the world with everything you do. Linda is taking a sabbatical for six months so she can concentrate on her study and will be back later this year. Marion had a sugary a while ago and she has a new home so she is buzy moving and hope to be back in May.
I found myself getting so excited about my friend and his learning and his success and coaching and facilitating new development that I lost almost all interest in my own climbing. This is potentially problematic because my climbing journey has hit the point where I’ve hit a wall(literally and no pun intended) and I have to work harder with less visible progress in order to succeed. Frankly, I don’t like this stage.
As for a discussion topic, let's talk about packaging: bottling, kegging, counter pressure bottle fillers, corking, etc.
10) Does “The Help” Hurt? It is all too easy to accept caricaturizations of others that affirms our sense of justice while never addressing the inherent assumptions that come from living in a culture that is still largely “white normative”.
Fast forward to 2011. Captain Camping of the Good Ship Family Radio had invited thousands on board to sail into eternity with him on May 21. All on board were ecstatic—after all, hadn’t Cap’n Harold said, “The Bible Guarantees It!”?
Well, some time ago, precisely in November i think, i wanted to try Windows Phone for myself so as the choice was limited to just a few models i picked up HTC Trophy. First impression was stunning. It was fresh, innovative, different from whatever was previously on the market and when you hold this phone in a hand you immediately know its Windows Phone.
Nah DUH.
We all felt the arrival of Zonke with the band setting up and all, as she was still waiting in her travel bus. Karabo did indeed confirm our assumptions and said that Zonke had arrived, thanks to the exclusive VIP re mo gwathile pele lol. Honestly I don’t know much of Zonke’s songs but thanks to the guy who was at the very front screaming his lungs out and introducing/rather requesting each and every song and Zonke adhering to his requests, I now know who Zonke is and what she’s capable off.
I have a quiet job. I work in a little cubby hole and don’t see anyone or talk to anyone. I stare at my computer and run reports. It has definitely made me into a social person because I yearn to talk to people. That being said, I am quite happy with my own company and enjoy being on my own very much.
Each child is an individual... does not come with an instruction manual! LOL Have a great one dads.
“His stuff.”
Also, I will give away my latest book, Montana Match, to anyone who can give me the location of the places in the photos.
P. G. Wodehouse, Right Ho, Jeeves ch. 16 (1934).
That was one of only a handful of stories my mother shared with me about her childhood. That story made me want to cry when she told me then. Even today, writing it out and imaging my mom as that twelve year old girl, excited about a fashion show and then being made fun of publicly, makes me want to lash out and scream at whoever thought this idea up in the first place.
It's OK that Pizza Hut won't deliver the $10 box to me because my lovely boyfriend offered to go pick it up for me!
B. Restricted, repetitive patterns of behavior, interests, or activities as manifested by at least two of the following:
While the tablet will feature Windows 8 OS or not is still unconfirmed and the company wants to keep the details to themselves even on the arrival of the tablet. But as of now we know that there will be a tablet from the Finnish manufacturer sooner or later and we can definitely expect a stand out product from Nokia nonetheless.
He mustn’t, just mustn’t, yes mustn’t be free
However, there are plenty of gaps still to be filled in the above account, which I’ve tried to acknowledge as I went along. The biggest omission here is an analysis of so-called ‘thick’ normative concepts. These are concepts which combine both descriptive and evaluative content, such as courage, cruelty, kindness, silliness, etc. The real issue with these concepts is to whether or not these different dimensions of their content can be separated out. My own intuition is that the answer to this is yes and no. I think that it must be possible to use the resources provided above to analyse the specific evaluative content of these concepts, to unpack the norms and values implicit within them. However, at the same time, I don’t think that doing so necessarily amounts to showing that the things they pick out are entirely objectively describable independently of this normative dimension. This might sound contradictory, but I think the crucial additional thing to take into account is the fact that concepts are revisable, that their content can change. I’ve discussed the importance of such revision in securing the possibility of objectivity before (see the TR essay). However, the kind of revision that objective concepts undergo is forced upon them by observation claims about the world (although this isn’t quite true for mathematical concepts, but I’ll ignore that here), whereas these are non-objective concepts whose revision is governed by our own authority (although the way it is so governed may vary). My hypothesis is thus that the inseparability of the descriptive and evaluative dimensions of thick normative concepts stems from the fact that the evaluative dimension plays an important role in the revision of the concept, including its descriptive part. However, this is still a very rough idea, and needs working out in much more detail.
Love Les Soldes this year: there's nobody there. I wandered round Le Bon Marche on the first day last week and it was positively empty - though I returned later with a friend after work to find things were hotting up a little.
One other thing that came up in session was what Tom said about me when he briefed her about my case. He said, 'Of all the clients to fight for, she's especially worth it.' I was kind of stunned that he had said something so strong about me, but it's a good thing because if he thinks that I'm worth it, then I must be worth it, yeah?
It may be tempting to settle for satisfaction in the default mode of our received religious instruction. But I will continue to seek a deeper understanding, drawing comfort from the biblical passage that “we see now through the mirror, darkly.”
I wholesale my studio line to botanical gardens, museum gift shops, historic homes, indie book stores and the like, but I also like to do a handful of retail shows annually to test new products and to get direct feedback from retail clients.
she’ll suck your life...
A lonely windsong playing through rusty winch
To me, he died twice.
so I won't be
A visit to your local library will be very useful. Try a book, which is a certain planet or object look through a telescope shows found.
Carrots, 2 medium, peeled and sliced
The food was brought out to us one plate at a time. It was a very high class feeling. I very rarely go to places where you get a three course meal...especially not one where American Chopper is playing on a flat screen TV in the background.... Course #1 was a side salad. Just your basic salad, nothing fancy, but it was very fresh. Course #2 was a colorful dish of BBQ pork ribs (which I have never ordered from a restaurant because my Mom makes the best ribs on the planet), potato salad, and some sort of warm cabbage/carrot dish that at first I was a bit afraid to try. The entire plate was delicious! If ribs taste like this all the time, I might have to start ordering them more often! Juicy, tender, fall off the bone, smothered in a thick, rich, tomato BBQ sauce...mmmmm.... The Potato salad didn't taste like the stuff that most places get in a giant bucket. The potatoes were cooked properly, and it wasn't 'fake' tasting like some. And while it was a tad scary to look at, the cabbage dish was actually really good! So good, that I now have to figure out exactly what it was, and how to make it! Course #3 was bread pudding with a lovely maple sauce. Now, I'll let you know that I LOVE bread pudding! Even if it's bad, it's still pretty good....like pizza. For some I think it may have been a little mushy, but I still loved it. There were blueberries in it, although there was some debate about that because they didn't have a lot of flavor. We ended up asking our server, who said they were raisins. He then went back and asked the chef, and walked back out to correct himself because they were, in fact, blueberries.
with a great body
Sometimes she brings it on herself though, being crazy and all.
Quality: Excellent
one sippy cup with mystery drink inside-original date of freshness unknown.
Wino of Electric Mud
1) Learn self denial, subduing your pride, and putting others first
This picture shows how I placed the pliers right in the center of the petal and wrapped it around the pliers. After I shaped all the flowers, I used my heat gun to dry them. Once they are dry, they hold their shape really well. I layered three flowers to create the "fluffy" flower. One large delicate snowflake and one small sun were glued together to create the stamen. I used brown card stock for the stamen and added gold to the points.
A challenge and a contest to WIN Lords Grace.
During a time when cleaned up the freezer, I found a box of left over raw pork belly. The pork belly was too fat that I didn't want to use it for my cooking. So, I thought off making pork lards with the air-fryer.
2010.08.14 Thailand Pattani 1 0 A local cop is shot to death by Islamic militants while traveling to work.
I always wait for the school bus to maneuver its way out of our circular parking lot before I return to our apartment. I tell Izzy I love her and wish her a good day at school as her ringlets undulate on the wheelchair lift. She flashes her charming smile at R, the bus driver, when he places the harness around her wheelchair and he can't help but smile back. I try to peak through the windows while the nurse and the driver secure Izzy's wheelchair, but I only see outlines and shadows in the early morning glare. I admire R's driving skills as he navigates the unwieldy yellow vehicle around the bright flower beds and towering palm trees. We smile and wave jovially to each other as he drives away and I smile and wave jovially to the undistinguishable figures on the bus, I figure one of them has to be Izzy. This morning, I also waived goodbye to a group of paramedics and fire fighters who are usually not a part of our morning ritual.
That’s what she thinks.
But His Grace exhorts his readers and communicants to revel in the pomp and majesty and celebrate joyously all day long, because this ceremony represents stability and continuity in an age of insecurity and uncertainty: it is an act of faith in a world of doubt; it is hope in despair.
In this case, this child is still a virgin as of my reporting knowledge, but the perpetrator was absolutely working on changing that. His conversation included spiritual abuse, using scriptures for his own sensual gain. Whether she is a virgin or not, manipulation takes place in young girls who are in various situations, with various backgrounds. Grooming and manipulation doesn’t look for a race, or purity necessarily – it looks for weaknesses.
Thursday (all day): Ladies Night featuring 2-for-1 Cosmos & Appletinis, 2-for-1 wine spritzers and $2 TNT Tuna Tacos.
The best I can
I have enough on my plate regarding my own family and matters such as the Connecticut house still being for sale and us paying for two households, and all the normal everyday living stuff that families deal with.
Nationalism and International Conflict
I’ve always struggled with my weight; I’ve never had an actual problem with it. I think it was my mom’s fault. (Sorry Mom!) She had my sister and then me, one after another, as soon as she got married, and then never got back down to her pre-baby weight. No wait–she had body issues even before she was married. But becoming overweight, and then obese, sure didn’t help her issues. I grew up hearing how fat she was. Somehow–I don’t know. Maybe I can’t translate this to Mom’s issues. Maybe I was just born with the same issues she was born with.
Salvation is at hand
So, instead of leaving, Kiki went further, joined more sites including Stickham.com. But with every site comes it’s sister snark site, and as Kiki was dancing around in her underwear in a silly girl game of fun for her fans, her haters were congregating, twisting her image and spending endless hours ripping her apart.
Watching football was so collective. Moving away from my home town I could watch it alone but for me that’s just not football.
3 – I love romantic comedies but cannot (for some reason) read a romantic novel. Give me a thriller anytime.
Barbara glanced at her hands. She had forgotten them. She felt dizzy now, too.
NTIA Finds 95 More MHz of Spectrum
I am a teacher (more on that in the coming “love your work” essay). Helping students see academic disciplines at work in everyday life is a crucial element of my teaching philosophy. For my money, sports (and food) offer some of the richest interdisciplinary experiences we encounter (also, they are “five sense” experiences). So, in short, I feel the content of this blog going in the direction of answering a fundamental question: how can we use college basketball to teach ourselves and others about the world around us? As I said, a longer essay on all this is brewing.
Since Todd came to North Carolina at Christmas we have been talking on the phone two and three times a day, texting, emailing and we have completed three full rounds of 20 questions via email. Flowers were involved, fed-ex has shipped various items for us and we have had conversations at midnight that make me blush when I think about them. So I got into LA midday on Friday and there was Todd in the airport waiting for me when I got off the escalator headed to baggage claim, grinning from ear to ear in a charcoal gray pinstripe suit and a really hot blue shirt. I had butterflies in my stomach the minute I saw him.
Good Evening
10) Any beer I was drinking...probably a German Pilsner.
Now move along before you start to suffer from crafty withdrawal!
“I cannot envision myself ever sending out tweets to the general public,” Gomes said. “I would just use it to look at subjects that I’m interested in.”
At the centre of our block is a mature chestnut tree, which brings pleasure to all of us neighbours, particularly at this time, when it is covered in white-and-pink flowers. Another neighbour has a wisteria, whose scent reaches all of us during balmy nights. Further down, and hard to see from here, is a flowering apple tree. I am so lucky to have all this within 4 minutes' walk of my office! Long may it last -- many of these historic blocks have been demolished to make room for huge new buildings such as the very office I work in...
Was there something inherently wrong with my personality that causes people to not see the real me, but see whatever they see to treat me how they please?
skin, kidneys, lungs pulled from
One nice thing about this batch that I hadn't planned on is the temp's. Here in Texas the temp is usually HOT! And because of this I usually keep my fermenter in a water bath covered with a T-Shirt, but it's been cold here lately, so no water bath for the fermentation bucket. I've been able to keep it in the pantry where the temp has been a steady 68 degrees. Nice.
I'm so thirsty
Eric and I went out on a double date with his best friend Jacob and his wife Emily. They are really fun. We went to Eric's favorite Italian restaurant, Marcella's. And after dinner we hit up Jeni's, which apparently has spread all over the place! It started out in Columbus several years ago, and they just opened up new locations in Nashville and ATL (and several other big cities, but those are the two that I'll actually visit). Our night finished with a trip the the piano bar.
The first recipe I chose was Tiramisu Cookies. Tiramisu is one of my all-time favorite desserts and I've been hanging onto this recipe for over two years.
Uniform cops eventually arrived, but the two detectives refused to clear out until their sexual demands had been fulfilled. The two detectives from hell were then allegedly arrested.
Everything for a donation
Roderick Russell!
Exhibit 2: The End of the Kitchen Counter Nearest the Table.
Having said all that, Schirmer does miss a trick or two. The Overture could do with a bit more lilt and swagger (the Danish strings could be more full-bodied here); the end of Act 2, where a preview of the Maskarade is heard as if through half-open doors, is too loud; synchronization is initially dodgy in Act 3, as though the chorus can’t quite believe the swift tempo; and the choral interpolations in the Tutor’s strophic song sound a little contrived. So collectors wedded to the lovable Frandsen set (sadly somewhat dimmed in its CD transfer) will find reasons for returning to it; and the richest comedy of all in Act 1 is to be found in the 1954 Grondahl (whose heavy cuts rule it out as a top recommendation, however).
OH YEAH! I remember……SEX! Or, at least sex BEFORE you get married. WHY? Because it’s not nice. And people will scorn you and you’ll be stuck, as a teenager, all alone by yourself at home toiling away at raising a child when all of your friends are out having teenage fun.
“This isn’t a year-and-a-half campaign,” Craig Robinson, a former Iowa Republican Party political director during the caucuses four years ago, said of Mr. Paul’s organization. “This is a five-year campaign.”
Anyway, yesterday I passed a small group of men and boys gathering firewood for sale, waved to them, drove on up a "primitive" road (one that's not maintained, so could be anything from drivable to morass--but the weather was dry), and found a promising looking stretch of land, so pulled off, parked, and went agathering, pruning shears in hand.
We are hereby requesting the Star to publish this letter as part of your paper's Right of Reply tradition.
The very nature of the Novus Ordo Sacraments, while not necessary invalid (but questionable in many instances), bear in them the theology of the New Rite and the Post Vatican II Church. To frequent these Sacraments is to mix the good, true, and beautiful with that which is present in the New Sacraments: novelty. By receiving the Novus Ordo Sacraments, you profess your Communion in and with the beliefs of the Novus Ordo Church, even those beliefs that are flawed.
blue winter cap,
1/3 cup soft butter
Intern: You have information on me? Since when?
In just a couple of days we will pack up what we need for now and move in with family and reconnect with each other. I will be able to appreciate my job as a mother again.
Which with a spotted skin was covered o’er!
I find it interesting that on rainy days there are very few kids in school. Today at Noah’s preschool there were only five kids in his class. My boys and I try to figure out the reasons for this. We have come up with these:
I’m proud to say that my quaint little school project, Grammar Wars, has been making steady progress. I’ve completed the title screen and the game engine is done, all that remains is to script the last couple of sentence generators.
You only have to look at pictures of old Birmingham, which show a fine Victorian city with buildings like Snow Hill station, which was like a cathedral in its proportions; the Woodman, a glorious Victorian pub; and the old library, to see the wanton destruction so often perpetrated by local authorities. The Bull Ring shopping area was redeveloped in the 1960s, and was so ugly, so unpopular and so badly constructed that it has since been redeveloped.
All the above-mentioned Acts Nos. 494, 496, 499, 500, and 600 before its amendment show that it was the intention or policy of the National Assembly, in delegating legislative functions to the President, to limit the exercise of the latter’s authority to the interregnum while the National Assembly or Congress of the Philippines was not in session until the date of the adjournment of the next regular session thereof, which interregnum might have extended over a long period of time had the war in Europe involved and made the Philippines a battle ground before the next regular session of the Congress had convened. And the authority granted to the President of Commonwealth Act No. 600, as amended, had to be extended over a long period of time during the occupation because, before the meeting of the next regular session of the Congress, the Philippines was involved in the war of the United States and invaded and occupied by the Japanese forces. And the President was authorized to exercise his delegated powers until the date of the adjournment of the next regular session of the Congress, for the reason that although during the next regular session a bill may be passed, by the Congress, it would not become a law until it was approved, expressly or impliedly, by the President during the period of twenty days after it shall have been presented to him.
And then…? Well, I guess, I got up.
So off to town to get the rest of the ingredients. Getting off the bus we met two young men in medieval clothing who explained that there was an event in one of the local churches. A Christmas tree festival, medieval living display, flea market and cake stalls, with carols in the background. It was only slightly out of our way so of course we had to go, albeit at a very slow pace:
The party realised that they had jumped to the wrong conclusion (and freed the demons in the process) and decided that another delve into the dungeon was needed to bring their quest to its proper end. The elves told them that although they did not know what the staff was, they could tell that it was an object of great power and that it had probably belonged to the holy man of the party of knights that had attacked the dungeon many hundreds of years ago. The party explained that they had met the ghosts of the knights. Ferros’ eyes lit up when he heard that the staff could be used by a cleric.
(karma for complaining i'm sure.)
“How does this look?” I asked, while standing in her bedroom with my new outfit. “Great! I LOVE IT!…but…” I blinked. “But WHAT?” I asked. “You need BIG GIRL earrings.” Apparently, with my dark curly hair, I needed some large silver earrings that wouldn’t get lost in my hair. I hadn’t worn earrings in over ten years, and explained this. “Too bad. Go get some.”
And the observant amongst you will have noticed an asterisk or two. Christine tells me that they are creating a new marketing status, between Grand Vin du Languedoc and Cru du Languedoc, namely Terroir d’exception du Languedoc. The asterisked areas have applied for that and will able to use the term to communicate about their area, but you will not see Terroir d’exception on a label.
Everything else, top marks (As or 1s depending on the exam type).
Finds a pot in the kitchen and places it on the stove. Getting the milk from the refrigerator, she pours some into the pot and turns on the eye.
The highly anticipated new album from the mighty Roadsaw!
As part of that mission, the Court of Justice of the European Union
Northern Rough-winged Swallow 4
The RMS Titanic of the White Star Line, largest ship the world had ever known, sailed from Southampton on her maiden voyage to New York, on April 10, 1912. She was built by Messrs. Harland and Wolff, at Belfast. She was a fabricated steel vessel of gigantic dimensions, registered at Liverpool, her gross tonnage was 46,328 tons, her length overall being 882 feet, with a breadth of 92 feet and a depth of 65 feet. The distance from the keel to the top of the funnels was 175 feet.
Unfortunately, Famous Studios would never see either the quality or the success of Fleischer Studios. In 1956 the studio was downsized again and renamed Paramount Cartoon Studios. In 1960 Paramount sold many of their characters (Casper, Baby Huey, and so on) and the cartoons featuring them to Harvey Comics, who had published comic books featuring the characters for years. Paramount attempted to create new characters, such as The Cat and Honey Halfwitch, none of which saw much success. Paramount Cartoon Studios would eventually close up shop on 31 December 1967.
My Skype informed me
4. Ann Taylor Feathered Mini Skirt - This mini skirt has all the dramatic flair needed to carry this outfit. The feather detailing on the silk georgette fabric is a layering of one luxurious detail upon another, yet the length of the skirt prevents it from becoming over the top.
5. Ramon Sessions vs. Ty Lawson
Good old fashioned white from the hardware store -- no name, just white -- right off the shelf. ;) I always use semi or high gloss on all of my moldings. I've used many different brands and don't find a big difference when it comes to glossy paint.
The love border is from Gypsy Wanderings and cut at 4.472 x 1.389.
To get his inspiration from.
building and building, so that you transcend the normal.
as she grew
I have been in denial about the life left in my blog for a long long time. I keep thinking, "soon, I'll get back into it and start updating it again," but soon never materializes. This week I started a new job at a regional call center as an advice nurse, and thus it seems a bit silly to continue an ER blog.
Princess Victoria: Do you ever feel like a chess piece yourself? In a game being played against your will.
roughly parallels those brought under the Rehabilitation Act.” Monette, 90 F.3d at 1177- 78 (citing Maddox, 62 F.3d at 846 n.2).
Said she couldn't "give in'' like that. I wanted to tell her submission isn't giving in but didn't want to appear to know too much about the subject. I haven't read the book but it does seem to have introduced vanilla people to the lifestyle. It is interesting how some books catch on. Laura Reese wrote two very good novels -- Panic Snap and Topping From Below and neither caught on the way this one did. The fact it is beach reading -- she said it was pretty simple and easy to read -- shows how popular it has become.
Scripture to reflect on this week:
#6. our local market carrying fresh fruit and veggies
These various aspects of our problems show that we are facing not just a few wrong-headed policies, but a challenge arising from the very nature of the Government and how it runs the State. Most of them have a direct impact on business.
NZ Prime Minister John Key was facing his country’s own version of the Oceanic Viking stand-off yesterday, as Sri Lankans holding NZ flags and signs reading ”We need New Zealand” refused to disembark from a vessel intercepted by Indonesian authorities near Bintan Island in Indonesian waters.
These are important. They show Brian's personality in very clear terms. He's an idealist, yes. But most importantly he is a good man. He'll never condemn another without hearing and deliberating over their side of the story. He'll never accept that a situation is impossible, and if there is ever a way to save lives or avoid their sacrifice he will fight to make that happen.
Some of the clips I've made have gotten very little traffic on YouTube while a couple others have become somewhat popular in certain circles. Part of the traffic problem has stemmed from having many of my videos blocked in this country and others by YouTube at the behest of pesky record labels who feel threatened by fans making their own videos to promote music they have the copyright to, or THINK thy own the copyright to. I say THINK, because in certain cases where my stuff has been blocked, the Powers That Be (namely Warner Music Group for the most part) think they have domain over unofficial bootleg remixes too. Hell, one track I used was immediately blocked WORLDWIDE in seconds, for a 25 year old song from a group that broke up years ago, but they felt the need to pee on my leg. But I have ways around this...
Level 17: MP Cost: 26, Damage: 295%, Number of Attacks: 4, 27% to inflict darkness on the enemy and lower it’s accuracy by 17% for 74 seconds. The last attack is critical.
Always something new to see.
2. Initiates a conversation about (post-) modern society and what it is lacking in regard to physical/mental challenges and discipline.
Frith, Simon (1981) Sound effects, youth, leisure, and the politics of rock'n'roll New York: Pantheon Books.
This is the cake that I made last weekend (the Weekend of the Two Chocolate Cakes) and was the second of two that I attacked. At first, I thought I'd finish them both by 5:00 (the time the potluck party started--the one where I said I'd bring cake whether the hostess liked iti or not), but this little baby wasn't frosted at 5:00, and I was already committed to the raspberry cake anyway. This one was going to have to wait for Monday, when it would go into the office to feed some lawyers.
Prime city centre office rents are reportedly unchanged at €296 psm (€27.50 psf) and CBRE reports that there is a very healthy 180,000 sq metres (2m sq ft) of requirements throughout Dublin at present with Microsoft and Arthur Cox amongst those looking for new space. Rents in the western suburbs of Dublin are estimated at €134.50 psm (€12.50 psf).
Fischer's Bitter
“Let the table of them be made in their own presence for a trap” (ver. 23). Like the trap which for Me they set, in giving Me such a draught, let such a trap be for them. Why then, “in their own presence”? “Let the table of them be made for a trap,” would have been sufficient. They are such as know their iniquity, and in it most obstinately do persevere: in their own presence there is made a trap for them. These are they that, being too destructive, “go down into Hell alive.” Lastly, of persecutors what hath been said? Except that the Lord were in us, perchance alive they had swallowed us up. What is alive? Consenting to them, and knowing that we ought not to consent to them. Therefore in their own presence there is made a trap, and they are not amended. Even though in their own presence there is a trap, let them not fall into it. Behold they know the trap, and thrust out foot, and bow their necks to be caught. How much better were it to turn away from the trap, to acknowledge sin, to condemn error, to be rid of bitterness, to pass over into the Body of Christ, to seek the Lord’s glory! But so much prevaileth presumption of mind, that even in their own presence the trap is, and they fall into it. “Let the eyes of them be darkened, that they see not,” followeth here: that whereas without benefit they have seen, it may chance to them even not to see. “Let the table of them,” therefore, “be made in their own presence for a trap.” It is not from one wishing, but from one prophesying: not in order that it may come to pass, but because it will come to pass. This we have often remarked, and ye ought to remember it: lest that which the prescient mind saith in the Spirit of God, it should seem with ill will to imprecate. …Let it then be done to them, “both for a requital and for a stumbling-block.” And is this by any means unjust? It is just. Why? For it is “for a requital.” For not anything would happen to them, which was not owed. “For a requital” it is done, “and for a stumbling-block:” for they are themselves a stumbling-block to themselves. “Let the eyes of them be darkened, that they see not, and the back of them alway bow Thou down” (ver. 24). This is a consequence. For they, whose eyes have been darkened that they see not, it followeth, must have their back bowed down. How so? Because when they have ceased to take knowledge of things above, they must needs think of things below. He that well heareth, “lift up the heart,” a bowed back hath not. For with stature erect he looketh for the hope laid up for him in Heaven; most especially if he send before him his treasure, whither his heart followeth. But, on the other hand, they perceive not the hope of future life; already being blinded, they think of things below: and this is to have a bowed back: from which disorder the Lord delivered that woman. For Satan hath bound her eighteen years, and her that was bowed down He raised up: and because on the Sabbath He did it, the Jews were scandalized; suitably were they scandalized at her being raised up, themselves being bowed. “Pour forth upon them Thine anger, and let the indignation of Thine anger overtake them” (ver. 25), are plain words: but nevertheless, in “overtake them” we perceive them as it were fleeing. But whither are they to flee? Into Heaven? Thou art there. Into Hell? Thou art present. Their wings they will not take to fly straight: “Let the indignation of Thine anger overtake them,” let it not permit them to escape.
- Golden chain handle
As promised earlier, here is part 2 to the food series, being posted slightly later than I had intended, but better late than never! I’ll skip the introduction since it has already been presented in part 1, so without further ado, let’s get to the goodies.
So, yes, I am a planner.
FN10 Kramer v. Elrac, Index No. 105273/2009 (Sup. Ct. N.Y. Co. Jan. 18, 2012) (defendant did not inquire at plaintiff’s deposition regarding her use of social media and did not establish a factual predicate with respect to the relevancy of the evidence sought, and the contention that plaintiff “must have” further electronic communications regarding her damages, in addition to what was produced, was insufficient to warrant discovery of plaintiff’s Facebook and other social media accounts); see Sterling v. May, Index No. 106943/2009 (Sup. Ct. N.Y. Co. Nov. 22, 2011) (plaintiff’s testimony that she had a Facebook account, in and of itself, was insufficient to establish a factual predicate necessary for disclosure of such records).”
So all's well that ends well, I guess.
The third condition is that she must not belong to those who are hostile to Islam. That is why I say a Muslim is not allowed to marry a Jewish woman from Israel, or from among the Jews who support Israel.
We want to remind you that we are a vintage, shabby chic or primitive challenge blog and when you enter one of our challenges, your creation must fit one of those styles in addition to following the weekly theme.
to ask when we are desperate
That's me peering out from that towel, knees bent, leaning slightly to one side, happy smile on my face. That's me feeling loved, feeling safe, feeling warm and secure. I wish that I could go back in time some days. Just for a day. Just for the opportunity to tell her how much she meant to me and to show her that she paved the way for me to be (hopefully) the kind of grandmother to my grandchildren that she was to me.
Seems as though your troubles disappear,
Make a mixture of spicy mustard and mayonnaise. Add a few capers.
Challenge Pack 205
Growing new topsoil
Luxembourg has the beginnings of a bridal tiara tradition at the ready, but we need more brides to tell us if the family intends it to continue.
Some of the B vitamins have unique functions within the body that allow a particular deficiency to be readily identified. Often, however, they work in concert so symptoms due to various inadequate components may overlap.
Because I’m German, of course.
My heart can only bear much.
But, as we said, this is all supposition.
Janitor: Excuse me. Where should I put this bag of scum?
Looking at a map of values for the parties we can see exactly where Blue Labour lies.
Or maybe I have noticed, but it just never sounded as strange to me as it sounds today. It just doesn't sound very Lou Reed-like to me at all. He's my grand old man of early punk rock. It's like Patti Smith using the word boobies instead of tits.
is already here
Did I mention our girl is not small? She's got most of the milestones reached, except she's not saying mama and dada yet. She says mamamammamam and Dadadadadada, but she hasn't quite said them to us. She knows what they mean, but she just hasn't spoken them. I'm wondering if the multiple languages is affecting that. I just mean that DH is teaching her spanish, I'm teaching her English, and we all teaching her baby sign language. I think it's just a lot for her to process. When did your little one's start saying mama and dada?
I bundled some wool into a bag and went over to Yorkshire for a few days to see my lovely Mum and sisters..the boys spent their time mostly up a tree and Arnie gets about seven walks a day:)
Seriously - irony taking a break here-
#39 During the Obama administration, the U.S. government has accumulated more debt than it did from the time that George Washington took office to the time that Bill Clinton took office.
Curry leaves: 1 sprig( I didn’t used)
Apart from Guinness, Spaten, Schlenkerla, Delirium Tremens, Lindemans and perhaps two other slots, draft imports will appear only at special times or during fests.
Every time I do, they make me smile.
Jerry: I think a lot of people either live in the past or in the future, but I just live in the moment. I don't think too much about the other stuff--maybe I should.
Usually it takes until the last row for someone to get mah jongg. Here's my first winning hand of the night with just a few tiles left to go! If you click on the picture and squint, you can see that I was matching the pattern in the second section of the middle of the card. I had never tried to match this particular pattern before, but it worked! Gotta say, I play a mean game of mahj.
And that's when my frustration crossed all boundaries, my hours of enduring the puja seemed useless and probably made me write this blog after all, because I'm sure that if the situation had been different I wouldn't have been as irritated on the puja as I'm now:
In his book Maharishi Vedic University: Introduction, Maharishi gave detailed information about the nature and structure of consciousness.
Holly Watt has since taped Vince Cable for the Daily Telegraph – without his knowledge. Not one of the refugees from the Dacre Mail has ever filed a Hackgate scoop since joining the Telegraph titles.
"Oh guys, give it a rest." Cassandra said. "This whole thing is brilliant, and you know it."
“Okay then, you can easily make a purple evening dress yourself. Or maybe Gran could make one for you. It’s not the end of the world, you know? And that business with the invitation… every year she threatens not to invite you. And every year you go back like a good little girl and have a good time. It’s been the same story ever since you were at nursery together. There’s no need to be sad about it now.”
“Can I use your bathroom?” Ann asked.
Friday night Angus does an altar call and sees literally 1000’s give their live to the Lord. Awesome! Out the corner of my eye I catch one of my medics holding his hand high up. Wow, and I wanted only Christian medics here. The night offers little sleep. Some patients need hospitalization. There are some broken bones from falls on the motorcycles, some medical cases, all stable, none life threatening.
Sayli BS. Low frequency of infertility among workers in a borate processing facility. Biol Trace Elem Res 2003; 93: 19-30.
So much for adhering to a schedule, life just did not want to be scheduled. I did however, have the best intentions but then there is a saying about that. Being a good blogger was just not in the cards with it being a short week.
There are radical differences between Commonwealth Act No. 689, Republic Act No. 66, and House Bill No. 978 on one side and Executive Order No. 62 on the other. That was the reason why President Roxas vetoed House Bill No. 978, believing in good faith that it would not solve and remedy the problem of house rentals as explained by him in his communication to the House of Representatives of June 21, 1947, setting forth his views on the bill. The President may not and could not substitute his opinion however excellent or superior for that of the legislature on matters of legislation when Congress has already acted and expressed its opinion and desire on the matter.
Be sure to keep checking back, or follow me on twitter. I always make a post when a new giveaway is going on.
White the rushing of the iron wheels is stirred?
“When all is well with Selangor and Penang today, what more if Putrajaya were to fall to the Opposition?” said a former UMNO lawmaker.
3) add the mystery item to your cart
I really really loved it this shade but the upkeep is TERRIBLE. First of all, my natural hair color is darker than the ashes of hell and so I have to bleach them every two weeks or so then dye them pink. And I also can't afford a new bottle of pink hair dye every month considering I'm saving for a ton of other things. Secondly, it doesn't really match my new clothes ;^;. I've fallen head over heels in love with Jesus Diamante again and I don't think my hair color would suit it so much. So...I think it'll be easiest to go super blonde again and just buy a pink wig for fun occasions xP
Ms. Twister had never visited such a prominent art museum I discovered on our way up. “Oh, you are in for a treat. They are holding a pre-Columbian exhibit.” I should have known, by the look on her face, I was the one in for the treat.
“Wait a minute, Baron,” you say. “You’re sensationalizing these things again! The kind gentleman from the Mexican consulate was just there to help Mexican parents find a good recipe for refried beans, or perhaps to provide a list of places in greater St. Paul where they can get their maracas repaired.”
In fact, if you look at the most recent example of Libya. Its oil production dropped from 1.6 million barrels per day (BPD) in 2010 before the unrest started, down to 96 million barrels per day as of September 2011 - that's a drop of 40%. To put this in perspective: at its peak, Libya's oil production was less than 2% of the 82 million BPD of global world oil supply; yet, crude oil prices jumped $10 to $15 per barrel.
Sam rolled his eyes. "Mom. You don't have to come. It's not like it's going to happen again. That'd be crazy. Besides, I just want to see if my blood is still there. I bet it is. It was everywhere."
*running back to word to continue my shitty alternate reality*
And then, as I watched the aftermath, mama settling into the tub, baby squirming in the normal fashion, the bustling attendant arriving and then being asked to leave, and the new baby girl seeming fine, I filled with joyful exuberance. That this one precious, tender, incredibly sensitive new little person could be born needing help and receiving that help from her mother in the warm safety of a tub is a transcendently beautiful departure of what neonatal resuscitation normally looks like. Nothing jarring, nothing painful or invasive, nothing panicked, nothing even as upset as my own response watching on a screen so many miles away. No, just family, breath appropriately applied, and the rolling of time into life here among us other breathing people. I felt buoyant and celebratory.
Turn on the bright lights, turn up the volume and scream into the microphone,
Jimi’s illness forces him to cancel appearances at various concerts and awards shows. In September 2003, MTV gives him a lifetime’s achievement award which he accepts via satellite from his New York home. He appears frail and sick but in good spirits. The crowd of industry insiders, musicians, actors, comedians, and suits, give him a 5-minute standing ovation.
Holder gives every impression, as ADL did through 19 years of hyping their hate bills to state and federal legislators, that all Americans are protected under hate laws according to "race, color, religion, or national origin." In reality, ADL never intended any of its hate laws in America - or throughout the world - to protect anyone except those groups ADL considers victims of white, Christian, male, heterosexual civilization.
The event has played in my mind a lot of times since last week. What I had assumed would be a solemn, formal event had been anything but that. Yes, we did put our purses, belts and folders through a metal detector at the courthouse, and of course, my ear-rings set off some bells as I walked through the scanner! But the security staff were pleasant and cheerful as they directed us to the courtroom assigned for the function. We stood in a long hallway for a while as another security person walked from one person to another greeting us cheerfully, checking our paperwork and inviting guests to enter the courtroom without having to wait in the line. She was kidding around with people and answering all our questions. In a cheery voice, she even let us know that we would be able to step out for a few minutes before the ceremony started to ‘feed’ the parking meters!
Birthday Bliss w NM $9.00
All applicants will receive an email when their application has been received. Successful applicants will be notified via email on Friday 4th March and the team will be revealed on our blog on Friday 11th March.
Commit to picking a space for every day where you commit to spend time in prayer.
The old west should be a fertile ground for novelists, it is, after all a somewhat uncharted history - a pre-history in many ways before official history gets written. Hollywood inevitably realised this a long time ago. Yet though there's a healthy store of genre Westerns,its not often that you'll find a Western up for a literary prize.
Sam Allardyce, Alan Curbishley and Steve MacLaren were all interviewed to be the Swede’s replacement, with MacLaren getting the nod having guided Middlesbrough to the UEFA Cup Final in the same year.
A colleague told me I was crazy for doing this. When I asked her why, she replied "What's keeping them from e-mailing it all over and you'd never get paid?" My response was simple and almost without thinking. "They're fellow gun-owners. Sorry, but that's just not how we think or do things." We loan our guns to fellow gun-owners for hunting trips or travel or someone's wife or daughter are going to be at the house or a hotel by themselves and all the husband/dad has are long guns or large caliber handguns. We hand our guns over almost unhesitatingly to complete strangers at the range and say, "Hey, try this one," while unabashedly asking, "I'd sure like to fire a round or two out of that baby."
It appears that Greece has had its 34th stay of execution. At 1.30 pm today (BST) George Papandreou said he would quickly call for a vote of confidence in his newly reshuffled pack of knaves. His rival Angelos Venizalos, newly installed as Finance Minister, has flown to Luxembourg to play his debut role in yet another drama meeting of EU central bankers and Chancellors. Merkel has moved a step backwards from her demand for obligatory investor haircuts. The IMF has forgotten its Articles briefly in order to waive the rules about the $10 billion bridging loan for Athens. Thus the markets have calmed down a little.
April Wine paid tribute to Clench on the band's website, but Greenway said they had lost touch with him after he left.
The package comes back, unopened. There is a note with it:
You ever eat a sandwich that completely re-defines the way you look meat and bread forever? This beer is that sandwich.
My kids' pediatrician writes a blog for Children's Hospital. Today, she posted about this study. It's VERY interesting. It makes you think about the quality of tv you let your kids watch. It's not about shaming parents who let their kids watch tv. It's about balancing media and paying attention to your kids' choices.
Really, tricksters are a lot like kids: they think in unique ways, not yet locked in by society's assertions; they delight in pranks; they are selfish, yet unexpectedly kind. A child is the ultimate trickster.
Got this recipe from an old chettinad cookbook. It said that, sugar or jaggery can be used for making this kozhukattais. I have tried both of them, both tasted very good. Of course the jaggery one had a nutty flavor and little thick then the sugar one. Will post the jaggery version latter.
to be happy in Jesus
Still nothing but canned programming on ORTM radio and TV, and no journal télévisé tonight. I’m also disappointed with Africable, which after airing some preliminary reports of unrest yesterday stopped covering the situation in Bamako altogether, and has since only aired news from other West African countries. The private network did the same thing after the March coup, broadcasting an early interview with Captain Sanogo before suspending local journalism for several days. Junta’s orders, perhaps? The Bamako newspapers were all mum today too, though it could simply be because of the holiday.
She takes out her phone and talks to it.
Arizona’s newest immigration law is making national headlines, good and bad. That has led immigrants in the state—legal and otherwise—to promise that they will move out of a state that they say is encouraging racial profiling.
They were completely oblivious to the orgy of frustration and impatience seething within me. The only clue was the twitching of my left eyelid; the sales associate in Lane 10 noticed, however, and started winking back at me. I wanted to throttle both of them, or gently ask if a swift foot to the taint might help speed the whole process along. I could suddenly see the merits of a concealed carry permit. But I took a deep breath, pulled my phone from my purse, checked the time, and settled for sighing heavily.
A few TBS milk
Look! They're almost orange -- like the sun or like gold. It's much more appetizing to think that I'm eating gold or the sun than someone else's almost-baby. Eating gold or the sun is so much more indulgent. I feel like a very rich person with inconceivably strong teeth or like a giant God-like galaxy destroyer.
I sigh. I lie down again. After a few minutes, he lets me out.
10. The washing still being in the machine when I be home from work, particularly if it’s been sunny and it could have been outside.
Happy Anniversary to my darling husband Mohammed. It has been an incredible eleven years and the best is still to come.
05. Soul Of A Woman
Chakras step down the energy entering the crown, this energy is then converted to the physical hormonal chemicals which affect how the physical body works.
I had originally wanted to make another top ten post, but these are these six blogs are the ones I find myself going to most often, and actually taking the time to read their older posts that I have missed etc. These 6 blogs have been super encouraging to me this year, and I'm sure they will be again next year. If you have the time, jump on over and check some (or all) of them out. I think you will be glad you did.
And Plaid's problem over recent years is that it has been ignored!
I'm not able.
I often forget to reprint my columns for Food & Dining, which are not yet archived on-line, so allow me to rectify the oversight. The following (as originally submittted) appeared in F & D's second quarter 2010 edition.
2 stars
ADD in cocoa powder and blend 1-2 minutes on MED speed
Mix all ingredients until smooth.
Did I tell you that I played Jesus once? I was the youngest new-born in the church when they did the Christmas Play. So I got to be Jesus and my mom was Mary and my dad was Joseph. That is probably the Holiest thing I have ever done. Since then I have sinned enough to burn in hell for eternity. (You’re thinking about holes, aren’t you? Stop it!)
- In San Salvador, drunk drivers can be punished by death before a firing squad.
There is no sex in this book. Anita is staying away from Jean Claude and Richard. I find it amusing reading the book as she does this. But the thing that I didn’t remember until now was she was feeling this pull of sexual desire. This hightens as Anita is transformed more with power that is coming to her.
Economists David Card and Alan Krueger have published studies of the fast food industry. Their studies show that even slight Congressional increases in the minimum wage cause minor job losses, and might even increase unemployment slightly in some instances. While Card and Krueger’s have been critiqued for underestimating raising the rates has because of the fact that minimum wage is already in existence, thus it is already caused significant unemployment for some workers. This factors are ignored. In their defense, I’m not sure how you calculate aggregate unemployment caused by minimum wage.
Last night we went to Belfast to have a look at the laser and firework display at the new Titanic centre which opened in Belfast last week....I was one of the few folk who didn't know a ticket was needed until they were all sold, so 30,000 other folk had a much better evening but we, at least, were able to watch the fireworks from beside Goliath - the huge crane in the Belfast shipyard where the Titanic was built.
Max Lucado wrote, “The phrase is a petition, not a proclamation. A request, not an announcement. Hallowed be your name. Do whatever it takes to be holy in my life. Take your rightful place on the throne. Exalt yourself …. You be Lord, and I’ll be quiet.”
We are romantic junkies. Borderline behavior will increase each time a new partner arrives. Thoughts of a perfectly passionate soul mate will drive us to do things that can be considered “impulsive.” But we are driven by a primal urge for this special someone to be our ultimate romantic love and savior. It is hard for us to look for realistic love when we crave this intensity. We are “in love” with being “in love” and will do stupid things to get our desires quenched. Usually, we end up disappointed because we don’t understand the transition from desire to love.
Number of Processors: 1
And now, you'r probably asking what falls within the category of OPC? Act on Free Access to Information sets out in the section 5a these three conditions:
Along Punggol Waterway, there are small shelters and underneath the road highways. The PCN tracks next to Punggol Reservoir and Serangoon Reservoir have small shelters as well.
win a gift pack that includes 2 of the concentrates, 2 of
feeding into that fear and nurturing it – we cannot win. Whether or
An adventure in my car visiting some of you.
Most management models are simple tools, frameworks or checklists. And any self-respecting model also has a self-explanatory (often 2×2) matrix to go with it, of the sort that looks good in a presentation, or on a flipchart or whiteboard. That being said most models are based on theories and have been checked out in practice. They also provide a means of framing (the useful bit!) strategic, functional, process or people-orientated issues; and are of course a source of plenty of new jargon to use in meetings…
Masing appears to believe the relationship between elected representatives and voters is analogous to that of a master and his large pack of registered dogs.
with matching brads
Just to recap, this is going to be a part of an occasional series of posts I'm going to make on this blog. This'll be where I compare an early set of lyrics to a later set of lyrics for one Joy Division song. Sometimes I may compare multiple sets of lyrics of just one song to each other. When you couple in a lot of the live variations to certain songs, you can get all sorts of results.
either
….While Amnesty International has put the entire onus for “Islamophobia” on non-Muslims, nowhere does it call on Muslims to accept responsibility — not only for problems brought about by the refusal of Muslims to adopt the values of the majority, but also for their efforts to displace these values with their own.
1 medium cucumber, peeled and thinly sliced
Of course, I did need something to glitter. I cut a circle out of a piece of lightweight cardboard, fortunately recycling day is only once every two weeks so I had a good supply! I spread the circle liberally with Martha Stewart glitter glue and poured my German glass glitter on top. I worked on a piece of tin foil so that I could pour the excess glitter back into the little bag.
On April 12, 2012 in celebration of National Card and Letter Writing Month, we did a post on how to “Deepen Your Character Profile Through Handwritten Letters.” We issued a challenge to readers to create a letter written by one of your characters and see if any new back story appeared. We did the exercise, and here is our letter and what we discovered. If you used our exercise we’d love to hear about your discoveries.
All paid with your tax dollar.
The Social Security Administration, which sent out 52 million checks, says that some of those checks mistakenly went to dead people because the agency had no record of their death.
I like dogs but cats make my eyes itch and my nose run.
When we moved into our house, I was 8ish months pregnant. We (yes, even me!) spent a ton of time painting everything because the walls were so dirty (I'm not sure how many decades it'd been since they were painted). The closets were sort of an afterthought and Aaron was tired so we (meaning just him!) just slapped some flat white paint inside our closets. We didn't paint the trim. We didn't make sure it was fully covered. We just did the bare minimum to cover some of the dirt.
Twenty-nine studies of ‘Upper Respiratory Tract Infections/Allergic Reactions’ yielded a “positive overall result in favor of homeopathy”. Results of “6 out of 7 controlled studies were at least equivalent to conventional medical interventions. 8 out of 16 placebo-controlled studies were significant in favor of homeopathy.”
In planning of the actual wedding, include the groom in the final decisions. -Gary
We chatted with the owner of the Inn and my daughter asked a few questions from her list of questions. Then we walked outside to view the gardens, where, barring in-climate weather, the wedding ceremony will be held, late in the afternoon on an August Saturday.
What makes it even worse is that nothing is established or foreshadowed or even introduced properly. (Conor certainly isn’t, which is part of the reason it’s very difficult to like him. The fact he’s incapable of telling an actually funny joke is another part.) For instance, Conor and his father are rescued by his mother shortly after their arrival in Tir Na Nog, which stuns Conor, since he’s been told his mother is dead since he was a little boy. But when does Lenahan introduce this fact? Right after she rescues him, which removes any impact the event might have had. This is essentially how the whole novel goes, to a frustrating degree. Conversations that introduce important things—like, oh, the plan for storming the castle—are referenced on the spot as if Conor has really, really poor short-term memory or is just really, really bad at telling stories. Plot points are brought up as afterthought, which means that even when the novel tries to be serious, it’s incapable of impact. To be completely fair, there are a few spots where Lenahan tries; for instance, Conor has a charm on him that keeps family from murdering him (a very useful trick in Tir Na Nog), which is how he discovers that he and Fergal are distantly related. But for the vast majority of the novel, it feels improvised, and poorly at that. On top of that, a lot of these characters are just… dumb and sometimes inappropriate. Late in the novel, Fergal believes the villain about what happened to his parents—despite the fact that he magically saw the true events some time prior, making him a complete idiot for doing so. Also, Conor ogles his mom twice. And the second time he knows it’s his mom. Yeah. That happens.
There is a useful explanation of the science involved on a site
Date : 00-05-2012
And it will only get hotter. Even in the best of times, April and May can be most unpleasant in Bamako. To make matters worse, Mali’s hot season is also the period when the supply of electricity is lowest (due to declining water levels behind hydroelectric dams at Selingue and Manantali after months of seasonal drought), at the same time that demand peaks. Which for most city residents means blackouts and sweltering nights in stuffy concrete-block houses, deprived of ceiling fans and air conditioning.
In the front planter (right hand side), we took everything out and planted a Birch Tree. We sprinkled in a handful of large rocks and small plants. This area gets lots of direct sun so it's been a task to find small plants that thrive in this planter. Peonies seem to be holding their own, and we also have a bright pink plant that is doing great in here but admittedly, I have NO idea what they are. I'll get back to you on that one.
5.) Cook till golden brown on each side checking frequently to avoid burning
But is this not how we live? The next shiny gadget will make us happy. We’ve all done it – I’ve played with iPads in the electronics store, with no way of ever affording one. But it’s fascinating to explore more deeply, see the advancing technology and how it affects people. I’ve suggested that Apple has somehow tapped into the original source of desirability, as all of its products seem to draw the customer more effectively than other brands. Or it could just be that they’re very well made and meet a common need.
thumbs and tails like monkeys.
Difference: -4.4
As Job said in the midst of his desperation, after he too lost everything, all at once: “I know my Redeemer lives…”
the light let into the temple falls, lemons rays
1/4 teaspoon baking soda
definitely
Trask’s remarks previewed the conclusions of the Coleman Committee report, which revealed that the team as a whole consisted of good students with good records of on-campus behavior who had a disproportionately high number of minor alcohol-related offenses, joining hundreds of other Duke students in such offenses.
Of course the thing about living through my fifth decade is that I am a bit more relaxed about it all. "Comfortable in my skin" is the saying isn't it? Well I've never been that. I have too many allergies. But I know what that phrase is getting at. I'm much more relaxed when talking to people, and people increasingly seem to open up to me.
Kindest regards,
The kids had a lot of fun and got the presents they were asking for. I have to admit, Christmas has always been hard for me. I don't know why, although I think its because growing up, my brother and I always had to go to two or three places. Now with my mom gone, Christmas just makes me sad. I still feel a huge hole in my life without her here. Holidays just seem to make the hole even bigger. It does make me more thankful for my family. Definitely.
1/2 teaspoon vanilla extract
Do the cover (and the author's name) remind you of anything?
Again, if you receive an email from the BWA, asking you to send in your fiction, my advice would be to delete it unread.
Easter decorating on the cheap
I created an entire teaching while reveling in the power of His Spirit guiding every direction of my pen. I saw with my own eyes the ink drying on the paper before me with His wisdom revealed for this group of people desperate for His love. And once it was all said and done and my pen was returned to the cup holder on my desk, I realized I reveled in His presence even when to those around me, there was no visible cause.
I have my 2 1/2km run coming up in three weeks and my goal is to do it under 12 minutes. My friend (a fireman) aims for under 9 minutes but hey, got to start somewhere. Yet another '12 Week Challenge' ending. Then we go on a cruise for 11 days. I hope those endorphins stay around
I really enjoyed this book! It's the first time I've read anything written by the author, Maria V. Snyder, and I must say I truly appreciate her style of writing! Fantasy is one of my favorite genres and Ms. Snyder did not let me down.
she sets me on fire
Q: In your Suvudu post about “Considering the audience” you have listed Tabasco, freckles and strawberry lip gloss amongst the list of things you dig but rarely see, so what fascinates you about these three?
Okay. Imagine a cup.. an ordinary plastic cup. The cup is labeled "FEAR." (Don't mind my crappy drawings.)
6.) leaves around stem stitch with lazy daisy (scallop stitch but skinnier)
McBride supplied a hand-grenade to two collaborators, who were planning on attacking the home of an- individual known as Mr Peter Klein. The collaborators received instructions from McBride on how to detonate and throw the hand-grenade. Both Mr and Mrs Klein were injured as a result of the attack.
In progress: 9
Serving suggestions: Layer toasted bread, extra virgin olive oil, tomato and dried basil, ending with a drizzle of the oil on top of the tomato. Or, add a layer of your favorite cheese like Mozzarella with fresh basil leaf.
I laughed almost the whole way through the Struck series by Rhonda Stapleton. The voice she has is great, but the situations she sets up are even more hilarious. If you are into contemporary with a fantasy twist, this book is awesome!
Brewers Art St. Festivus
I have an incredible granddaughter, who will all too soon learn to call me "Grandma" for that.......
Then thats where I do the rest of our shopping and everytime we pass the deli J asks for
The Handyman’s Handbook: The Professional Approach to Do-it-Yourself by Edited by Jeremy Harwood & Lawrence Clarke hits the £1 shelf in my shop.
ps: in a way i kind of understand how indeed it is hard for us to express ourselves. i've been quite active before i flew off to Jordan. i joined some volunteer groups in a mission to help improve the condition around. But now, little by little i feel a little part of me has gone lost. i no longer feel the passion i use to have. am i the only one?
In conclusion, even though Solomon is considered the wisest of men, and a good man, that was BEFORE he used his “wisdom” to go after things and belief’s that God specifically told him not to. God’s wish is for all good men to come to him, but he is no respecter of persons, and will pass judgement on all who disobey his commands.
Lots of other different elements on these cards, mostly self explanatory. The gorgeous lace, button, metal corner and lace heart came from Linda. The buttons card is a Stampin' Up stamp from a set called Sew Suite. The papers are Stampin' Up Springtime Vintage unfortunately retired now.
Twenty-Four Hours in Tunbridge Wells
A man wants to be a woman first, while the woman wants to be a man of the latter.
ROGNESS Ost London Porter
I find a lot of great things in many religions. There are many great lessons and some of it reads like beautiful poetry. I don’t think there is a particular one that is better than the other. As long as they are religions that practice and preach understanding, love, peace, self awareness, and more they have something to say that is important to anyone. I do not subscribe to anyone who uses violence or spreads hatred or ignorance in the name of God. I’ve run into far too many Christians that speak things so far removed from the thing they say they base their life on that it makes me sick. Using religion as a means to hate someone because they are different than you is nothing less than ignorance and personal hatred.
No. 10: A group of ‘batang hamog’ from District 2 robbing a taxicab
It must be a lot to take in. Of course it is. I remember my first visits to an Orthodox Church. I would plant myself in a pew behind a large pillar so that I could watch and hide all at once. As soon as the service was over I’d break for the door. There’s still a little of that tendency in me. The icons, the chanting, the incense, the bright stained glass. Priests and altar boys in robes moving about. The periodic Paschal shout of “Christ is Risen!” answered by a hundred voices shouting back, “Indeed He is Risen!” Of course he needs someone to clamp down hard on his eyes. Sometimes it’s just too much. Turning all of his attention on me seems to have the same calming effect. Sniffing my hair brings him down to a more familiar, less stimulating place.
The movie is too good to spoil by telling more of what happens, except that Munna Bhai and Circuit approach medical school the same way they’ve approached everything in life. For instance, if you need top marks on the entrance exam to get into medical, then obviously you blackmail someone smart to sit the exam for you! But although Munna Bhai’s approach is that of a don, his heart is full of the respect and compassion that the modern medical profession at his school is lacking. And so Munna Bhai in the end teaches the school far more than the school manages to teach him. A very good, very funny, very endearing movie, with excellent performances by a stand-out cast. Watch it!
Skills shortage
Teaser Tuesday is hosted by MizB over at Should Be Reading. Anyone can play along. Just do the following:
That done, I returned here, purportedly to hit the hay early, but you know what I'm really doing. Though if I hadn't been waiting all night for my husband to call (dead cell phone, remember? Figure it's cheaper for him to call me than for me to call out from the hotel), which he is apparently not going to do, I might have gone to bed earlier. Aren't you glad I didn't? :oP
Tender Kiss: Little Baby Hudson has had no shortage of kisses. Larissa peppers him with her love daily...many times a day actually. She doesn't even mind when he is crying. I am continuously surprised at how patient and kind she is with him. He couldn't ask for a better sister.
No one could tell me any different.
16.FAITH "No Choice"
Kelly was unsure of her exact birth date but believed that she was born late in 1850, sometime between October and December. This is not far off from what Leslie thought at the time. In her letter to Kelly, she put the birth date at January 1851.
Any suggestions would help me get through this month!
We, the undersigned, are deeply concerned by the rapidly worsening health of Soni Sori in Raipur Central Jail. She has been passing blood with her urine, is having difficulty to sit or get up, and has lost considerable weight. Despite doctors from NRS Medical Hospital having confirmed that stones had been inserted into her vagina and rectum, Soni Sori has received no proper medical attention. We fear for Soni’s life and are outraged and ashamed at this inhuman treatment of a woman in India.
a : community of interest, activity, feeling, or experience b : the state of being a fellow or associate
Sorry for the hiatus. Here's the thing about the real world: you think you're going to have more time on your hands since there are no tests to study for, classes to attend or all-nighters to pull. Work from 8:30 to 5:30 five days a week and the rest of my world is free for the taking, right? Wrong.
But the real main event today was a dare from my friend Val.
We are all her.
Bright and pure but dirtied. Dirtied by me and myself…………
“What kind of present my love?” Christian smiled back at her, hovering over her as he lightly stroked her cheek.
Eleven years ago, I met my best friend, Deanna. We were in a technology cohort our freshman year of college, and became fast friends. From the second semester until I got married (a semester before I graduated and a year before she did), we were roomies. She was my maid of honor (standing by me through some craziness, even when I didn't deserve it) and I was her matron of honor. She came and sat with me when I was in labor with Maddie, and I was able to sit with her when she was in labor with Ashlyn.
91. The World according to Garp - John Irving
One of the benefits of having a Mango Moo Shake is that it’s useful in cutting through the spicy dishes.
When it grew dark, I had to resort to the built-in flash of my camera. I used a simple A4 sized paper as a flash diffuser. I had learned this trick when I read about ‘flash diffusers’ some time back. I too wanted to have a diffuser for my flash so I came up with this idea. I usually fold an A4 sized paper sheet into half and hold it in front of the flash. Folding the paper makes it portable to hold and also adds an extra layer to diffuse light more. Make sure that the diffuser is not exactly touching flash. Have some distance between the flash and the paper that you are holding, this aids in more light diffusing. We use diffusers to avoid the unwanted dark shadows behind the subject. Moreover it also helps in avoiding a pale or oily looking skin of a subject.
In the copper-coloured prairie
it is an opportunity to respond as my Lord would...
Hello everyone !!!
I was especially interested in the panel on writing series. The authors on the panel were Carrie Vaughn, Jeffery Deaver, Joe Lansdale and Robert Crais.
So I went to the optometrist. Unlike previous visits where I go to the optometrist attached to a glasses shop, this time I went to a true doctor of optometry. He's the guy we see for Darby's dyslexia.
And then one evening, I was laying in me bed I just started praying, praying for forgiveness …It was a very heavy prayer which I do prefer to keep some stuff to myself, but I started crying (I’ve become very emotional after that for some reason) and I just placed my life before Him, asking Him to now guide me.
One upon a time we had a living room. It looked like this:
As a woman, the man I am with will be number 2 and never a number 1. I don’t need some insecure dood whose self-worth lies in other women flirting with him while simultaneously taking a jab and disrespecting his g/f or SO or wife. If he isn’t secure enough in our relationship to know that I am with him based on my own desire of him and not what others think of him, then he needs to bounce and remain single.
The U.S. Department of Defense sent the Growler for 6+ years to create the implied threat of nuking the frozen tundra of Siberia, known only for desolation and prison camps for dissidents? Might have killed, oh, a thousand dissidents, then sent the fallout eastward to, oh, Alaska and on to Canada?*
The Duke and Duchess were married in June of 1937, in France. An ill-advised trip to Germany after their marriage led them to be suspected of being pro-German. The Duchess was even plagued by rumors that while they were in France before the Germans invaded, she had passed confidential information onto the Germans, through a German lover. During the war, the Duke was appointed Governor of the Bahamas, where George IV felt that he could do the least damange. Wallis bitterly referred to the island as their “Helena,” a reference to the island that Napoleon was exiled to after his defeat in the Battle of Waterloo.
You and I cannot let them succeed.
Like I said, this weekend was fairly boring, hopefully next weekend's adventures will be more my style.
BBC Worldwide have announced that the multi-award winning Doctor Who Experience, previously located in London, will re-open in Cardiff on 20th July 2012.
We are not racists, we are not Islamaphobic, we do not hate because they are different, but we love because we are special, because we are all we have, and because we are being destroyed.
But I couldn’t get the picture.
When Olivia gets older say 4 or 5 I am hoping she is going to want to fly kites with me but at that age she will not quite be ready for stunt kites so a single line kite will be more in line for her to start off with. Fortunately Prism, my favorite kite company, also has a product line of single line kites too. Some of these kites are designed so that they can be easily stowed away in a book bag, luggage, car or wherever. Their newest addition to this stowaway single line kite design is the Delta Kite. Right now Amazon http://www.amazon.com/Prism-Stowaway-Delta-Kite-Spectrum/dp/B0044TGS1I/ref=sr_1_1?ie=UTF8&s=sporting-goods&qid=1295043084&sr=1-1 has the Delta kites available ranging from about $20 to $34 depending on the color scheme you chose. That $20 price is great and lucky for Olivia and I the $20 one is in the Spectrum color scheme just like my new Quantum Stunt kite. So it didn't take much convincing myself to use bit more of my birthday money to go ahead and buy Olivia one of the new Prism Delta Stowaway kites in the Spectrum color scheme. In the meantime until Olivia is old enough to fly it herself I will now have 3 Prism Stowaway kites in my quiver, 2 Diamond and 1 Delta design, which is a perfect number to match the number of cars we have in our family. So no matter what vehicle I am driving, if I am out and I get somewhere with some good wind and open land I will always have a kite on hand to fly.
I have had many diaper bags over the past 3.5 years but I have had my Coach one for a while. I love it! The perfect size and tons of pockets!
And I would end each day with words of wisdom,
We do realize as we look forward, to the time when the fascination of helping birth a new
Cream ribbon - carnmeal cottage
Here’s the site to actually verify if the local paralegal agency is licensed and has posted an Immigration Consultant Surety Bonds in California:
Another by-product of pride is vanity, which intensely craves admiration and applause. It is undue assumption of self-importance. It often results in open and rude expression of contempt and hostility. It quickly takes for granted superiority and privilege, which others are slow to concede.
I think it's an inherently human quality to want to accumulate "stuff". And maybe even more likely if you're an American. I heard it said recently that the ultimate American Dream is "to have enough money to do what I want, when I want, how I want to do it".
The challenge over on WhoopsiDaisy this week is Eastertime....it does not have to have an easter theme you can make a card for eastertime using spring colours ...I have created an Eastertime Wedding card as something different
Leo, almost simultaneously: "Aw, shit."
I arrive in Perth from Adelaide in a 31 degree heat to find an elderly lady being given a good sniffing-over by one of the airport security dogs. Aha! I think, The only drugs you are going to find on her will have been prescribed by her doctor! But this dog is not looking for drugs; it is a ‘fruit dog’ and this old lady looks a likely suspect to be smuggling in a nectarine or a kumquat. I walk quickly past them hoping the dog does not smell the mango flavoured ice cream I spilt in my lap from the in-flight meal.
Look at the precious little bag it comes with too!
5.not over me
Never Contrary. I have to thank this lady for the immortal lines, I have reached the point in my life where I have a decent amount of grey hair and I want to show it. I am proud that I getting older. Hell, If I wasn’t I would be dead right?
There is none so acute
Let our powers combine! (15)
Her creations have such a global outlook - she will get the recognition that she deserves and more.
I wanted to die. You made home life that bad. Did you even know that? I was suicidal since I was 12. 12! I tried killing myself for the next 9 years. Only this year, when I am 20 have I decided that maybe I want to live.
In a speech delivered in 1941, Nero Wolfe author Rex Stout proclaimed that, “Watson was a woman” (for a full transcript, click here). There have been occasional attempts to adapt the canon to fit this idea, most notable of these being the 1987 TV-movie, The Return of Sherlock Holmes, featuring Margaret Colin as Jane Watson. In Sherlock Holmes Returns (1993), Watson was absent but the Great detective was given a female sidekick in his place. News now reaches Fedora that Stout’s theory is going to get another wrinkle in a new TV series. Elementary is the proposed title for the new US show in which Johnny Lee Miller will play Sherlock Holmes and Lucy Liu will co-star as Dr Watson. But how radical an idea is this? Well …
Huge game for these two, as both currently occupy relegation places. The nature of relegation six pointers is that there are plenty of goals. However I’m not so confident that this one will go that way.
The Moth is a non-profit organisation that brings real life stories to audiences that would otherwise never hear them. Writers, comedians and every day people are invited to hone their craft of storytelling and share them, without notes, to a live audience. My first exposure to the Moth was through the weekly podcast series which can be downloaded from iTunes every Monday (not that I’m not commission. Yet I was captivated instantly by the immediacy of the stories I heard; despite the fact that these people being half way around the world and from completely different lives and backgrounds, I felt I could relate to them. The Moth’s stories are moving, inspiring, informative, often challenging and above all, entertaining. Sometimes hysterically so. There’s a great power in what the organisation does, giving a voice to individuals who may never have the opportunity to speak out in this way.
China, which last month for the first time publicly announced a target for reducing the rate of growth of its greenhouse gas emissions, is refusing to accept any kind of international monitoring of its emissions levels, according to negotiators and observers here. The United States is insisting that without stringent verification of China’s actions, it cannot support any deal.If there's reason for optimism about the world's ability to do anything useful to slow our eminently foreseeable slide into global environmental devastation, it is this: if the US and China can just work out a framework for tackling the problem in a meaningful way, then Europe and Japan would surely follow; and just like that the countries producing a substantial majority of emissions will be on board. The rest of the world would not stand in the way (though OPEC would surely throw a fit).
So you’ve emptied out, cleaned out and thrown out. Now what? It’s probably going to cost a fortune to re-stock the pantry. It doesn’t have to cost an entire paycheck to stock your food cupboard with healthy food. Here’s an example of what about $50 can get you:
when he suffered, he did not threaten;
8/21/10
Received great news at work last night!
As I disembarked the plane I overheard a guy flirting with a young lady. He tells her he is a police officer. She sounds excited to be chatting to a cop, and then he admits that, well, he is actually just a volunteer police officer at the Met.
5. Once you select frozen dinners, pick individuals which are not solely low in fat, but low in salt and ldl cholesterol as well.
The rules are simple:
So much for the romance of post-war air travel.
November 7th, 2008
INSECURITY causes us to focus on the faults of others so that we don’t have to fully face our own issues (we tend to judge ourselves by our own motives and others by their actions);
Those in Peril has some very sexual and violent scenes. Is it your intention to shock people?
I have been getting some SPAM stuff again, so I have turned on moderation again!!! I am sorry if this causes any trouble for you, just trying to keep those unwanted and nasty comments out!
DH: “So let me get this straight. Most, if not all of your audience is, in point of fact, as it were, one could say, deaf?”
Remember your honest answer and go to question 2.
William Shakespeare’s Romeo and Juliet is over four hundred years old and we are still captivated by its story of “star-cross’d” love. The passion, the fury, the frenzied swordfighting, the rivalries and the play’s ultimate tragedy have been examined worldwide by scholars of literature for many centuries, but the tale of the two young lovers will never grow old.
Miss Pettigrew was rediscovered and reprinted in 2000 to critical acclaim. Producer Stephen Garrett read the book and found it to be “extraordinarily uplifting, completely captivating, and life-affirming.” He optioned the film rights and was introduced to fellow producer Nellie Bellflower. He had her read the book, which she enjoyed so much that she agreed to team-up with Garrett to bring the novel to the big screen. In fact, it was Bellflower who first thought of Frances McDormand as Miss Pettigrew. She gave the book to the actress’ managers. They all loved it and McDormand wanted to play the title role even without a director attached or a screenplay written.
After completing the card, the white space in the top right hand corner just seemed a bit much so I added the star banner for a little balance and visual interest! Phew, all the April Verve sketches done - with a day to spare none-the-less!
Our pricing structure for a paperback book is simple; £1.20 for the cover, and 1p per page. Therefore, if your book is a paperback 5"x8"and has 170 pages, the cost to print one book is £2.90 (£1.20 for the cover, 170 x 1p = £1.70) plus P&P. *Please note there is a minimum print cost of £2.28 per book and the minimum pagination for a paperback is 48 pages.”
Typical Dominican food has some sort of rice, or mashed potatoes, with a meat either grilled (like chicken) or in a sauce. The meat choices are usually beef, pork or chicken. I was surprised at how easy it was to get white chicken meat and that it was the same price as regular chicken – something we don’t find in Haiti. The sauces the meat was in were always tasty. Also sides of veggies which was nice. Plates were substantial and in most cases it was difficult to finish them, even when we were really hungry.
"And secondly, and more importantly, there's the issue of a replacement donor. We'd need to find a suitably healthy young woman, ideally one who had once supported President Mbeki, kill her, and remove her liver; and ethics approval for that kind of thing can take weeks, even for someone in the Presidency."
Further, in my conversation with Camilla on Monday April 5th at 10am, she indicated that Good Vibrations was asking both its online and in-store customers to make a donation towards the genital reconstructive surgeries. This is in addition to the vibrators and body care products Good Vibrations donated. Again I’m confused since that is two very different messages coming from the same company. Did you at any point ask your customers to give any donations that would end up with Clitoraid or Ms. Dodson’s work in support of Clitoraid?
My friend, fellow blogger and self-described crabby old fart Don Mills recently wrote:
David’s main motivation for taking this trip is to continue his journey in self exploration and perspective as well as positively impacting the lives of others –“ something I have learned from good friend and founder of Hope For the Silent Voices, Eric Lyons.”
:: sat in a rocking chair on a porch holding my husband's hand on a summer evening in old age...
Navel oranges, .69/lb. at Sprouts (through 12/22/10)
Best for showers, Scrubbing Bubbles Mega Shower Foamer: With a super-wide spray of foam that sticks to tile, glass, and fiberglass walls, it's a shower for your shower. Just spray on, let sit for three minutes, and rinse. Note: One application uses almost an entire can, but it's needed only about once a month.
Whisk together the remaining milk (1/4 cup), egg, and vanilla. Pour into the flour mixture and beat until all ingredients are just incorporated. Beat for about another 30 seconds to one minute until the batter is smooth. Do not over mix.
“I’m sorry, that’s not the only reason we should get married.”
Now please don’t get me wrong, I have loved working with the group of lovely ladies on my team so far, but being the only bloke on our programme has, at some points, left me feeling very isolated. So it was a great relief that I immediately bonded with our new additions and can, I hope, count them as friends.
I put all my PL supplies in it so that if I want to go
So the snakecharmer begins a snaky sphere
Interestingly, it might not be the recovered emails themselves that cause Mr Bird most trouble, but instead the fact that they never disappeared at all. On one view there was action taken and replies given which prevented information legitimately sought by the defence from being put before the court. That evidence might have been of no use to Mr Sheridan – in fact it might even, depending on what it said, have harmed his defence, but the Scottish Editor of the NotW, whether unintentionally or not, acted so as to deprive the court of relevant information.
All that said, RIM hopes to whet our appetites with glimpses at some of the nifty little touches that BlackBerry 10 will sport when it sees a widespread launch later this year. TechCrunch went to Waterloo and met with Vivek Bhardwaj, RIM’s Head of Software Portfolio, who took a few moments to give us one such sneak peek — an early look at BlackBerry 10′s keyboard, still a work in progress.
I’m a beer drinker. Always have been. Never really into spirits and wine just ain’t my thing. Beer. Good beer and good company and I’m set.
The South Wing is stocked with 20 yellow and orange European lounge chairs that cost $1,092 apiece, artistic pendant light fixtures and two alcohol-burning fireplaces. The project morphed from a $300,000 furniture update to a $2.3 million overhaul with new floors, study rooms, lighting and built-in, wood-framed book shelves….
by the swirly taxes the multiple piles
Captain CRAIG asked the Postmaster-General whether he received a communication from the inhabitants of the parishes of Killany and Inniskeen, South Monaghan, through the medium of the rector, requesting an evening collection about 6.15 and the erection of a pillar box on the public road near the railway station; whether he is aware that such a pillar box at Essexford would convenience not only residents in the county Monaghan, but also those on the border in the county Louth; that the pillar was half built and the box about to be placed in position, when the postal authorities suddenly ordered the work to be stopped; can he state why their decision was reversed at the last moment; and will he give instructions to have the scheme completed that the residents may enjoy postal facilities to which they have been looking forward?
I found his grave, years later, searching online. Some memorial website. It was weird looking at an old tombstone for someone you still, subconsciously, very much thought of as young and alive. I also found a newspaper article about the killing. This is based on what happened.
The temperature is too warm for a jacket but too cold for a t-shirt. Oh, and the fall fashions are delightful! It's definitely my favorite time of year to buy clothes (and wear them).
On the Market Breadth Ratios we went from a “Sell” signal to a “Buy” signal with 15 trading days. We got a “Buy” signal on this chart on 4/26/2012. This correction happened in a long term uptrend on S&P500 and Russell 2000 (representing the big cap and small cap indexes).
1/2 tsp baker's amonia (Hartshorn) or baking powder
I have a confession....I'am a reality T.V junkie. Yes, it's true. I just can't ever get enough
Green beans are overcooked and mushy. Black eyed peas too. They tasted good but it was kind of like black eyed pea soup.
Tell us exactly where in the US constitution it says “Oh, but this isn’t genocide on White people!”
Author Questions and Answers:
PS 45:2;
﻿﻿I then going over all the face in Blush using small circular movements. I dont go over the apricot & oatmeal to much just lightly to blend all the colours together so there are no lines. The colours blend into the next one so it looks natural as possible.﻿
let the beads of sweat fall like leaves to you
Our house is still standing this morning. I am thankful the storms split around and spared our little town. It is sad others did not fair so well.
Thank you to Christina for hosting this event that allows bloggers to share their favorite recipes and creative craft projects. We can't wait to see what you have to offer this week!
Well its now March . that means dry February is over for me!!So Thursday night, I went out with the girls, had 2 glasses of wine, made good food decisions and was pleased with how restrained I was. Then came last night- I drank a bottle of wine and ate 3 pieces of pizza-and I have a massive hangover today. My head is pounding, I'm even a little nauseated-WTF!! OK, I think the deal is, I can have a drink but right now,it can't be wine, I do find it hard to have one glass.I am able with all other alcoholic bevvies to have one, so so be it.That's the plan, and I feel good about it. This attitude is a NSV for me, If I mucked up in earlier times, I would just throw the towel in and continue to eat badly, but now I can get myself back on track without doing too much damage:)(it even hurts to smile)
"Think of your spine ending inside your head, not at the top of your neck, and feel your head floating there atop the spine," my Alexander teacher tells me as she helps me relearn the posture of a child, one of many tactics of a strategy I am waging to alleviate the pain of repetitive strain injury that radiates from my hands up to my neck. So I focus on the essence of that physical relationship, and the unlikelihood of carrying around an eight-pound weight upon something as thin as a spine, like a Chinese circus performer balancing a white plate vertically on the end of a stick. It is almost easier to picture my head invisible, like those of vestal virgins standing in stone along the lane of the Roman Forum. Those heads are gone from their bodies—weightless in their absence—yet their essence remains, sacred in memory and imagination. However I think of it, there needs to be mindfulness of my head and spine as one, in flow.
The first question wasn’t a hard one, and it was on a topic I’m pretty familiar with. Unfortunately I didn’t realise that I was supposed to be in a different room from the majority of people until I got to the main exam hall, so by the time I ran to a building I’d never been to before and found out where I was supposed to go (up three flights of stairs and through a myriad of double doors) I barely managed to sit down before the exam started. This completely threw me, for obvious reasons, and it took me a good fifteen minutes to be able to think straight – and it didn’t help that I felt really underprepared for the exam in general.
Yet where to start? Is it prudent to begin at the beginning? Yes I believe the scene needs to be set.
The cakes seemed to bake up nicely and on time. I cut off the top to see what was under the hood and was not very pleased. I was hoping for a tight, delicate crumb ... but I got something bordering on dense and with some big holes.
However, after a helpful, responsive email exchange with the shop in London, I found that my size was in stock and they would happily ship it to me from the shop - which is remarkably helpful - and they even provided me with the measurements.
* Photographs CAN be watermarked with photography websites.
Where am I going with all this? I get emails by the dozens talking about making the most of small spaces. And although I have shared some of the things we have done to make our home functional for us, it's always fun and inspiring to see what creative things others have going on as well!!
Note : You might notice that there are prawns in the photo which I added for my kids. You can omit the prawn for vegetarian version. I have used this similar photo in my none vegetarian blog, Peteformation.
- The first 100-mile Farmer’s Market of the season is this evening at our Co-op. Plus, our regular city farmer’s market starts up this coming Saturday, and our organic CSA starts in three weeks!
Mandela was the terrorist leader of a violent terrorist organisation, the ANC (African National Congress) which was responsible for many thousands of, mostly black, deaths. The ANC's blood spattered history is frequently ignored, but reminders occasionally pop up in the most embarrassing places, indeed as recently as this month the names of Nelson Mandela and most of the ANC remained on the US government's terrorist watch list along with al-Queda, Hezbollah and the Tamil Tigers. Of course the forces of political correctness are rushing to amend that embarrassing reminder from the past. However, Mandela's name was not on that list by mistake, he was there because of his Murderous past.
Writing in a Turkish newspaper, the Hurriyet Daily News, Sophie Quintin Adali, an analyst for a project of the Atlas Economic Research Foundation, said, "As if the debt crisis weren't bad enough news, the climate freeze sweeping across Europe is wreaking havoc by severely disrupting travel, business and people's lives. Local authorities, indeed whole countries, are caught poorly prepared." Turkey is experiencing record snowfall and low temperatures. It's the fault of those lying bastards at the EPA that Turkey doesn't have enough snowplows.
In 1984 the warehouse converted into apartments.
but you pay for that
So apparently there's one man who can turn back the new Ice Age: Hans Brinker.
There's nothing on the Connect2Law website that indicates which areas of law are covered, though presumably soft intellectual property is likely to be covered even if highly specialist areas such as patent litigation may not be.
5.take back your life
His words came back to me later at the milonga. Tango is all about feeling the rhythm and fitting in... The rhythm of the music, the partner and the space, a completely non-linear process that needs brain capacity but most important, acute senses. And the Catanians they know very well how to do this, because life for them is not only what you are and believe, but also reacting constantly to a fluid environment. They are connected with this ever-moving city, dispersing in its narrow streets, interacting with each other, constantly receiving stimulations and responding by instinct. And while the numerous monuments reminds them about their past, an active volcano nearby also makes a clear statement that nothing is to be taken for
Sofitel Minneapolis
Marijuana marijuana, Juana juana mari mari
Choose to fly for you are my moon, and I am your sun
Don't even get me started on artificially-scented and flavored cherry items. Pencils, lip balms... you name it, I loved it.
Near the end of September 1854, twenty-eight people, which included men, woman and children, were slaughtered by savages, in three different locations, in a manner that points directly to typical ritual-type killings. Most of the victims were brutally tortured before they died. For example, -- one of the men, Hermanus Potgieter, was first clubbed unconscious. His body was penned down on a nearby rock bed, and while he was still alive and fully conscious the savages proceeded to skin him in a similar fashion one would skin a wild animal. He eventually died while the savages were ripping the internal organs out of his body. The incident was witnessed by a coloured man (Bushman), called Oersog, --- the sole survivor of the incident.
Papers : The Black Currant Stack by DCWV, Melody Collection by Prima
MAC Cosmetics Fashion Sets are available online (USA) and will be launched in stores on 3rd May 2012, USA! Free 2 day shipping happening now online at MAC Cosmetics USA. Go check it out! For us Malaysians, we shall be patient and wait till it is internationally launched. I see many nude and pink shades! I can’t wait..! Is this collection seen anywhere else around the world? Do share! Till then, toodles!
As Mao reminds us, while external causes (new communication techniques) are condition of change, it is the internal causes (contradictions between social forces) that are ultimately the basis of change, with the external causes becoming operative through the internal causes.
Yes, she has vocal chords. THAT DOES NOT MEAN SHE SHOULD BE USING THEM. To make matters worse there's talk of her dueting with the legendary Jean-Jacques Goldman. Unfortunately, I have vivid memories of Jean-Jacques, and his ridiculous cheese being played during yearly crèpe parties of high school french class. It was bad enough that I had to listen to him back then on his own; teamed up with Celine just feels like some kind of Pentagon-torture-mix will be unleashed on to the world.
In the photo above with the fan you will notice we scraped paint off the freshly painted walls.. That's because someone before did such a poor job puttying that we have to literally scrape and re-texture the wall to do it right. We also hit a lot of snags with the paint they used for the trim in our home-- it peels off by hand and requires a lot of care to keep it from making a bigger mess while trying to fix it.
While the characters are stunningly depicted–the pain of their lives visceral and unforgettable–the story itself is a bit long and at times tedious. The abuse (a colorful variety including physical, emotional, and substance) is so intense in the beginning that when Leo and Audrey’s stories veer off into more mundane day to day activities including swim meets, random dinners, and eventually naval academy training for Leo, our attention starts to drift and we long for a return of what drew us initially. There are several smaller side elements that could have easily been culled in favor of, ironically, streamlining the abuse/murder mystery plotline to keep our attention glued to the pages, but overall, Ms. Lane impresses with her dark contemporary tale and I will certainly be looking for more of her in the future.
I’m glad I wasn’t one of the judges; I know I could not have picked a winner.
He has several babies to choose from, an entire basketful, and he is careful to make sure everyone gets their shot at some time outside, but it's the baby bear that seems to be his favorite now. 'Twas not always so.
Unfortunately, many of the best private schools originate in charitable institutions which took in the poor (in an era when wealthier children were educated at home, by tutors), which makes all discussion of destroying them totally unpalatable. That’s a shame, because clearly private schools are taking a lion’s share of the best teachers and resources, and the old argument that people putting their children in private schools saves the government money just doesn’t stack up—certainly not when that 7 per cent is clustered in particular bits of the country, with plenty of areas probably approaching a state school enrolment rate of 100 per cent.
Proprietary purgatory fo sho
Buying or selling a home or property should be one of the most enjoyable experiences of your life. Most of the time, it’s the largest investment you will make. Jae Kim of EXIT Real Estate Solutions in Columbia, SC is your Award Winning Real Estate expert in Blythewood, Columbia, Lugoff, Elgin, Lexington, Irmo, Chapin, Camden, Cayce, West Columbia, and the rest of Greater Columbia. This is what we do every day. We can simplify the process for you so that you can enjoy the the experience and avoid the pitfalls that often result in stressful transactions. Call 803-348-3052 today for World-Class, Award- Winning representation.
Afrikaner Boer Francois du Toit (38) was executed by 3 attackers on his farm outside Roossenekal in the Northern Transvaal. He heard a noise outside and got up to get his pistol from the safe - a ridiculous practise forced upon the law abiding citizens by the regime to protect the terrorists - but at that point three terrorists have already gained access to the house, and shot Mr du Toit in his stomach.
Sassy: No mommy, "commode-all" is another way to say "I love you" in Spanish.
To banish your defenders; till at length
Cath Campbell was born in 1972 in Ilkeston, UK. She lives and works in Newcastle, UK.
Gospel: “Good news.” This is the plan of salvation, wherein Jesus suffered and died for our sins so that we could be saved by obeying commandments and ordinances and anything else that is required of us.
Vår Frue Kirke.
I certainly wasn’t disliked; nor did I dislike most of my class. I like to say that my coolness was simply under-appreciated.
Actually..at the end of the day I forgot I was even wearing them~ Was seriously about to hop in bed before I had to remind myself! I was kinda skeptical about pink lenses at first but against my natural eye color they turned out to be a tad bit lighter version of the purple ones I have.
3 euonyms
5. Trend or Trending.....
The photo was attached to an email thanking us for pajamas we sent to an orphanage in Lesotho, Africa. Once in a while we are able to share a few pajamas overseas when someone we know from the US is going on a mission trip. Here’s what Belinda wrote:
6) I love Coffee! “Well anyone who reads my blog would probably figure that out quickly.”
John McLaughlin - guitar
It actually took me a long time to try it in the first place – only yesterday. I got the game on release day, finished the campaign a few days ago, and have been playing either co-op vs AI or single player vs AI. The fact that I was getting owned against a medium AI had me very worried.
Most of the steps proposed in these essays, in turn, are inefficient – indeed, deliberately so. It’s unquestionably nefficient in terms of your personal time and resources to dig up your back yard and turn it into a garden; that inefficiency, however, means that if anything happens to the hypercomplex system that provides you with your food – a process that reaches beyond growers, shippers and stores to the worlds of high finance, petroleum production, resource politics, and much more – you still get to eat. It’s inefficient to generate your own electricity, to retrofit your home for conservation, to do all the other things we’ve discussed. Those inefficiencies, in turn, are measures of resilience; they define your fallback options, the extra strength you build into the bridge to your future, so that it can hope to stand up to the approaching tempests.
Amazingly, Kristen survived her suicide attempt… but the 33 freight cars that ran over her severed her legs. Now she not only had to deal with depression; she also had to face the physical pain and life without legs.
Ginger-Garlic Paste- 2Tbs
I love to paint to music. What I've been into recently: The Silver Apples
In the second half of the recent Manchester derby, City’s Yaya Touré petulantly bounced the ball hard on the turf at his frustration over one of Mr Marriner’s decisions. The man in black instantly brandished a yellow card for dissent. Fair enough one might think?
— TURN — Qd Kh 6s 8c
So when it came time to see if another Julie Michelle had beaten me to the punch, I was a bit bummed. It's not really that big of a deal, I could be JulieMichellePhotography.com or something similar.
More oftentimes than not, much low-priced cartridges would be faulty and would modification your printer. You present pay much author in fixture costs than what you would forestall in the best locate.
Crème Chantilly is the perfect finishing touch for summer's freshest fruit--peaches, raspberries, strawberries, cantaloupe. A spoonful of freshly whipped crème dresses up a bowl of berries or sliced peaches to create a perfect summer dessert.
This has happened before. I'm sure he'll be back next time (the date was earlier this month, so maybe he had a conflict). But it wasn't helping at that particular point. I had practically promised certain people vintage cards in exchange for the few '71 Topps that I needed because I KNEW that this guy would have them. And now he wasn't there.
Black powder was used in the western world from the 14th century, until the early 20th century when it was replaced (except in recreational and "traditional" hunting use) by smokeless powders. The transition from black powder, to smokeless powder, began in the last two decade of the 19th century, and was complete prior to world war 1. These days, people only shoot blackpowder for fun, and because many states have a hunting season limited to blackpowder firearms.
When I think about 2010 and what it might hold, I think about everything I've learned in the last year and am hopeful I will put it to good use in the next.
I also sadly watched her family lose a son to cancer at the age of 21, two years ago. I had already moved out of state but kept in touch via email and phone.
acknowledged two months earlier that it was investigating complaints about him.
It is not necessary for you to be a follower of my blog
It's still hasn't fully hit me that I will be a mom of 3!!
06.Tan........Orange...Hazel.........Webbed Hands & Feet
Alluring
field of blue
I'm still happily sorting through all the new pots here at the studio, took some photos of some to apply to some shows. This firing is reminding me of fall more than ever it seems, as fall is creeping closer and closer up here in these parts. The pots are more reduced and a bit darker and even flashed a brighter red this time. That could be because we put a pound less of soda in this time, as well, which was an accident, actually. We had all the soda measured out but didn't notice we forgot to put in the last pound we had planned to put in. So some of the pots were drier, but others came out with a nice balance of soda and red flash, which is usually exactly what I'm going for, I love dark red! I'm quite happy with this bowl below, had a couple of them like that, as well as the platter below.
Then i want my own place, and as a child i though i would have all this shit by now, at 19!, but no, im just a regular college girl (ugh), wish i was doing more with my life
Some Transgender children have to face many challenges in life, the difficult part deals with all forms of abuse within society and bullying is no different. Bullying is a common experience for many children and adolescents. Surveys indicate that as many as half of all children are bullied at some time during their school years, and at least 10% are bullied on a regular basis. Bullying behaviour can be physical or verbal. Boys tend to use physical intimidation or threats, regardless of the gender of their victims. Bullying by girls is more often verbal, usually with another girl as the target. Recently, bullying has even been reported in online chat rooms and through e-mail.
My ‘regular’ Barbour is an International (that’s not me by the way) which I have owned for at least fifteen years, I have been flung off my motorbike in it, had the wettest Scottish days out in it and spent the hottest summer days lying on it. You can apply a revitalising dressing, Barbour supply a tin which reinstate the smell of a newly bought jacket but just like any beauty product, they never promise your youthful looks again, at best they may hold off the rigours of life…temporarilly. These dressings tend to trap any detritus in the preservation process and as these jackets can never be washed properly, years on year they get better as each page of weather is preserved literally into its fabric (this could be my imagination but I am sure they also get heavier?).
I went back to Runner’s Edge and told them about my experience. The guy told me I needed a shoe with a larger toe box so my toes would have more room. He set me up with a pair of Brooks Adrenaline GTS shoes. They felt great on my feet and had the support I needed. I’ve run many races in this model shoe and have been very happy with them. These became my shoe for the next seven years or so.
begin lighter and gradually add more ink to create darker areas ... easy peasy !!!!
Thus, I'm actually finally coming to my point.
one to cherish and love.
I don’t knw if Sappho was bisexual (She couldn’t be 100% lesbian in the actual meaning of the word be cause she was married to a man, she had a daughter and she wrote love poems for men too, not only poems dedicated to young girls) but one thing is clear: Sappho was a feminist. Sappho was a promoter of the feminine values, such as beauty, aesthetic sense, softness etc. Sappho was teaching young girls to be more feminine, to be proud of their femininity and love themselves for what they are. I don’t know if the legends about the homosexuality of the girls who came to the Isle of Lesbos to become the followers of Sappho were real but the Isle of Lesbos was one of the places where women had more rights than in other places where they had no right to decide, not even about their own life, they were forced into marriage, raped and used only for giving birth to children. That’s what Christians hated, the fact a woman can do something better than a man and encourage young girls to rise their heads and say no to the male domination. That’s why they destroyed her poems and for the same reason they killed the scientist Hypatia, who was a great mathematician interested in astronomy too. The Christians made the Greek people misogynous, homophobic and very intolerant. In the ancient Greece homosexuality was not punished and gay and lesbian people could live normal lives but now the church intrigues to hate against them while many of their own monks in the Athos mountain (where the access of women is forbidden) are gay and hide this and judge others for this.
The hill on the construction site was cut down so it would be on the same level as the new engine house of Hook & Ladder Company No.1. Then the level of the street was also cut down and leveled.
(The menu for this past/current week)
As of now, we are not 100% certain who will replace me, but we are absolutely positive that it is the Lord who has built this ministry and that it is the Lord who will sustain it.
Suite-heavy arena
Next up was this double bedroom. This is one of the two bedrooms that we began last fall. Our carpenter added white wainscotting to the lower walls below the eaves and textured paintable wallpaper above since these walls were in rough shape and a coat of paint wasn't going to cut it.
This is the institutional theory of art which is a theory about the nature of art that holds that an object can only be art in the context of "the artworld". Whatever an artworld is.
To celebrate the new nonstop routing from Boston to Tokyo, Narita Japan Airlines, a partner with American Airlines, is offering double miles for flights between April 22 – June 30, 2012. Registration prior to flying is required. Use promo code BOSTY. There is no limit to the amount of double miles you can earn.
We bounce through Heathrow and land at Barajas bang on time. It is an amazing airport – huge and light and extremely well connected to the city via buses and the metro system. We opt for the metro and are amazed to see that tickets are only €2.50 to whizz us all the way from the airport to our hotel.
What I wore today..
Some of you will dislike my vehemence on this subject, as I banish your favorite comfortable clothes to the same hell reserved for Crocs,Uggs, and Leggings Used as Pants without a Tunic (very similar to the sweatpant situation but even worse because everyone sees EVERYTHING, girl.) Sorry about that. But don't you want your booty to look the best it can?
2D's a great show. Long may it continue.
Although most of the aspirants to the Catholic priesthood already have been granted the necessary “nulla obsta” from Rome, all candidates will be evaluated a second time by Rome after they have completed their course of studies and been examined on it. If Rome is satisfied, then the Vatican grants a “rescript,” and the path to ordination is clear.
(Thanks to Peter Harrison for this post!)
I suppose I’m doomed to serve as an example to youth that Crepes are the true ‘gateway drug’.
In honor of the passing of Pete Nelson I have chosen my poem The Heron as the Poem of the Week. There are people and moments in our lives whose beauty is beyond us at times and since the unique character of each moment is fleeting and each form, each body is not meant to last forever at times we find the moment or person has passed . . . and it almost seems . . . well . . . I’ll let the poem do it’s work . . .
A pendant for my aunt. It's lime green thread by Lizbeth with a thread of silver with it. Also there are some little beads in the middle. I'm not tooootally happy with it, but she liked it.
6) You can get an American express air miles credit card and then for each $20 you spend, you earn air miles. Therefore if you put big purchases on your Amex then you can earn air miles really quickly.
2 cups whole wheat flour
Why are people not wanting to get married? Maybe society has made it easier for folks not to get married. After all - who wants to be "tied" down for the rest of their life? Don't you want to be an independent person? Who wants to work through an argument when you can just walk away and move on to the next bump in the road with someone else?
This one had strawberries, cherries, kiwi fruit, apple, orange, apricots, peaches, nectarines, mango, fresh pineapple and banana. All organic. The bowl here is the after shot of when four servings have been taken – it’s a big bowl!
A second team would operate the big gun thing…and a third team, if necessary, would hold off any attempts to recapture the emplacement just long enough for me to swivel the weapon round and take out the House of Commons.
They open the door.
Schick Disposable Razor $1.75/1
Just like Bruegel, Majewski occasionally indulges in fantasy — and just like Bruegel, he shocks you with sudden bursts of violence, laced with hints of political significance. This painting was created during a period of Dutch lay opposition to the Inquisition as it had been implemented in part by the state. Spanish soldiers circle around this film, but the film demands that you do the work of figuring out what they’re doing, and why they’re doing it.
Not long ago I was driving home late from work and found myself passing by numerous bushes of varying shades and hue. Realizing that I simply couldn’t stop in someone’s yard and pick these, I enjoyed them from a distance—and yet I longed for that lilac-y smell. That’s about the time I noticed a few wild bushes growing next to the freeway—two or three of differing types. I pulled my car off to the side of the road and picked a couple of the clumps.
From the institution that is The Post Punk Kitchen, by authors Terry Hope Romero and Isa Chandra Moskowitz (arguably the most popular vegan cookbook authors, and with good reason). Forming a triology following Vegan Cupcakes Take Over The World (and it did! those cupcakes are faultless and earned me ridiculous amounts of "oohs" and "aahs" everywhere I took them) and Vegan Cookies Invade Your Cookie Jar, their new pie book has made it to #1 on Amazon.com's "Dessert" cookbook list. According to the testers and photos I've seen, this book is going to be amazing. All kinds of pies (in all kinds of forms, with all kinds of fillings), cheesecakes made entirely from scratch (no tofutti required!), vegan whipped cream, and plenty of dough tips to achieve delicious, flaky pie crusts for beginners. Click here for Isa Chandra's Blog, and here for Terry Hope Romero's blog.
We talked about positive words in an earlier post and then in the last post we talked about negative words and today we will continue in talking about negative words. We will talk specifically about some the ways that we unleash the power negative words in our lives.
However, putting that aside, if the latest story is to be believed, it would seem that in her statement, the good Hawaiian doctor was claiming to have personally verified a document which Hawaii had destroyed seven and a half years previously.
It's not about race. It's about rational responsible apportionment of the duty of people to pay SOMETHING to contribute to the nation. However, it seems to always default to race - to the argument that being non-white should entitle you to a free ride on the backs of others. This lead to the welfare state that we find ourselves saddled with where politicians buy votes from one group with money from another. AND have a vested interest in keeping poor people poor.
I don't really know what the doorbells of Venice and the fabric of Fortuny have in common other than that for me, they both conjure up the history and romance of another world. xv
I guess I thought my friend would step in give a 'give her some time' speech. But he didn't. Of course not he was obviously the one who had called Jack. Sneaky plan. Waiting until I was tipsy and wouldn't be able to just drive away. Choosing a public place so there wouldn't be a scene. Awkward cough. My friend slipped me a you know what you need to do look,turned straight in his chair and then as if offering us privacy put up some kind of invisible wall.
And my favourite city?
I hope everyone has a wonderful day today! Do something nice for yourself today. Treat yourself to a latte, or a 30 minute reading break from your daily routine, or a walk with your dog. You will be thankful you did.
He pointed to the last book in the series, The Fire Ascending.
The gatekeeper opens it for him, and the sheep hear his voice,
As we are now in between challenges I decided this week to pull Miss Anya Lounge out of the package to make the following.
the warm, rust brown yet this image really works"
Much love and life to you today!
I am doing well with my physical therapy but this recent bout of rainy, wet weather has set me back a bit :p But I don't think there is surgery in the near future for me - yah!
We’ll get there in a while!
As he wrote in “Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences” those with the aggression-related form of the gene responded to the pictures with increased activity in the amygdala – the brain area that detects danger, but less activity in the cingulate cortex – the brain region that is believed to control aggression.
My wedding tip regarding how to choose your wedding palette is quite simple. Go to your local paint store - or Home Depot or Lowe's - and pull the paint chips that you are attracted to.
every organization has at least one..might even be us ..
The Malaysian Insider made Ramlang Porigi’s startling revelations their top story with a story entitled ‘Anwar campaign undermines Saiful’s Quran oath‘.
Pip Ballantine and Tee Morris are greatly responsible for my own interest (sometimes borderline obsession) with steampunk. When I endeavor to write steampunk, I look to them for guidance. Without them, I probably would have remained mostly ignorant of such a wonderous genre, subculture, fashion, and everything else that steampunk is. I will always be grateful to them, and I hope one day I can meet them and express my thanks in person.
2 tablespoons sugar
Is the notice contractual/verbal or understood?
The researcher’s nose had stopped bleeding and he blink his eye in drowsy consciousness. Laurel stood. She faced Tom, staring into his broad, eyes while his light shone brightly on her face.
 The general resulting “dumbing down” of Whites and all the lessening of White racial consciousness and pride will make us even weaker – will make it possible to even further brainwash, propagandize, and indoctrinate us and ultimately to control, manipulate, and dominate us.
Zac got Joey's bed, Joey sleeps on the futon and the dog found a comfy spot on the futon cover that needs to go to the laundromat! Christmas bins have been taken from the attic and piled in front of the fire place. Yikes!
Ozone is part of the fracking air pollution problem (now even in winter overlaid on other sources of ground level ozone): What Will Fracking Do to Your Food Supply? The controversial gas-drilling practice is tainting water. Your food might be next, by Barry Estabrook May 18, 2011. People and plants even in sparsely populated rural areas are at risk according to that article:
...Winehouse-ifying myself for Halloween.
What would you say?
The Hex we see on the splash page has long hair in a ponytail, a more ornate Confederate coat and holds his pistol with his pinky extended. Now on to the story.
My beautiful mother, Martha, turns 60 today!
In the second chapter, Paul reminds us that the elect was dead in their sin and trespasses. That we walk blindly in a world of darkness, and by nature we were children of wrath. Being a corpse, He made us alive together with Christ. Paul re-enforces salvation by Grace through faith and not of works.
Cook beef with taco seasoning and onion flakes.
So anyhow.... where was I? Oh yeah. Working on the computer today, and playing with colors. I am importing some recent artwork into Photoshop, and I am "playing" with my Pantone Color Bridge. Oooooh- it's kind of like paint chips on steroids. The best thing about using a Pantone Color System is that it is standardized so I can tell a manufacturer EXACTLY the green or orange or pink I want. I just say "Pantone 376U, please!" and that's (hopefully) what I get. (You may remember I started working on this artwork a few weeks ago. Also note that in that post, I talked about feeling scattered. Obviously, things have not changed.)
Police established the brothers had been targeting another person they thought lived at the address. When they realised they had the wrong victim, they decided to demand money from the Wangs anyway.
Baku - Seileen
As I walk from earth into eternity
5oz (just over ½ cup) Butterscotch Chips
So for this challenge, I wanted to go the soup route for a couple of reasons. First, I was thinking of a butternut squash and champagne soup I had about 15 years ago at a local restaurant and winery - the Renault Winery in Hammonton, NJ. This soup was so amazing that I remember it 15 years later. Alas, they have changed the restaurant since then and don't have the amazing meals they once served. And after perusing the recipe sites, I was unable to find anything that resembled this soup. I had to give it up.
So, hop on twitter and Facebook and #spreadtheshadows. Let's get it trending! I will arrange some prizes for the top participators!
I hope you like the card and HAPPY CRAFTING!!!
major trends - knit patterns/fabrics and tights
Summary At the age of twenty, George Ritchie died in an Army hospital. Nine minutes later, he returned to life. What happened to him during those minutes was so compelling that it changed his life forever. In Return from Tomorrow, Ritchie tells of his transforming encounter with the Son of God, who led him to encounters with other nonphysical beings at the very doorway of eternity.
P.S photo taken from our veranda :)
Mouth feel: This is a relatively lush brew.
Place on oiled and semolina dusted baking tray. Cover with a tent-like setup so the loaves remain untouched and let rise for an hour.
but the face looking back is someone i’ve never met.
Some of the most arrogant writers I have seen are people who went into debt paying to learn to write, because they believe this is the fast track to becoming the literary demi-god they see themselves as. These people come blazing into the workshops, wielding their degree and their college project piece like it is the Ten Commandments of God. Let me be clear I am not saying it isn’t the Ten Commandments, not once have I mentioned that any of these writers are ‘shitty’ writers. I couldn’t say that and wouldn’t. What is shitty and not shitty is so subjective anyway, unless in reference to some mainstream media, then it just stinks so bad you can’t deny it. This piece isn’t titled The World Of Shit Writers, and so I will not digress further into this rabbit trail.
Let's Eat Now!
When you visit a blog that you like and want to follow, leave them a comment with your link telling them you are following from the Fun Follow Friday. Of course, we would love for you to follow both hostesses blogs, Simply Stacie and My Wee View, but it isn’t mandatory. If you do follow us, just leave us a comment and we will follow you back.
Former First Lady Barbara Bush said, “Libraries and librarians have definitely changed my life and the lives of countless other Americans. They deserve the support and patronage of every single one of us who values education.”
Cigarette between my fingers,
My brother Chris wrote a comment on my Father's Day post a few days back, in which he reminded me that I am his hero. I responded by telling him that he got it wrong, and that in fact he is my hero. And, since this is my blog, I get to have the last word. So there.
The problem here is that Longenecker does not give us any reason to think that the semantic component “begotten” is absent. In this context, we even see the author dwelling upon the strange manner in which the Phoenix engenders its one offspring. Why should we think that there is no idea of “begetting” in the word monogenes in this context? We also note that in the immediately preceding paragraph (which Longenecker does not quote) the author is comparing the resurrection of the dead to the regeneration of a plant through its seed:
In fact, with so much going on, it’s quite possible that you might have missed some key Panini America developments in the last 144 some-odd hours. So with kickoff to Super Bowl XLVI now just hours away, we thought a comprehensive recap of the week’s events was in order.
So he allows it :D
The blush brush (£9.99) is much larger than your average blusher brush, this is very soft with a medium density and a slightly tapered tip.
The resident added she had a relative of Pakistani origin and so wouldn’t have signed in support of far-right candidate Mr Whitby.
What have you done for a mystery theme or activity?
are still walking?
11/1 – Club Impact – Tacoma, WA
“Gimme the keys J.P. I’m drivin’.” Joshua said. Jaxon tossed the keys to Joshua with one hand as he handed the half-drunk quart jar of corn squeezins to Freddie with the other. “What’d you make that out of Clooney? Taste like you took a dump on the corn and added iron or lead to the brew!” J.P said as he wiped the drop of moonshine that escaped his lips. “Don’t be messin’ with me boy. You know my shine is pure apple and grain. Get off my mountain!” Clooney said as he pointed his cane toward the dirt road. “Now git!”
Tip: The cake board I used happened to be foil covered. I bought it before I had the idea for the foliage. If I would have known at the time I was going to completely cover the board I would have bought a plain board.
So I had given a few of you a little sneak peek of our latest product on our Facebook page. Not a fan of our page yet (shame on you!)? Click here and it will take you there. All you have to do is click 'LIKE' and you are in! And then YOU can be the first to know!!
I enter her room and wake, yes, wake her up. I give her a cuddle and notice there's something wrong with her hand.
This summer we have some "projects" I want to get completed around the house. Hopefully my list is realistic and I can actually get some of them accomplished. We'll see.
But the leaders of North Korea are keeping their country’s wound open by picking at it and encouraging festering rot.
For my "evidence" requirements I used book papers (probably my favorite part of this layout) to create the layering detail beneath my photo. This idea came to me by accident- I'd intended to layer some wrinkled book pages behind my photo but the pages were to big so I was tearing them into smaller pieces. I ended up not liking the look of them behind the photo- but I started playing with the torn strips, wrinkling them up and distressing them a bit- and this is what I came up with! :)
Now he is too big to sit on my knee and he cringes when I kiss him goodbye at the school gate.
Where is the honor? Where is the purity? Where is the truth? Who is lovely? Who can we admire? Where, where?
The number in Barry's hand is paper pieced.
with the twin heart’s bend.
We were home a little after the time that the kids got off the bus. Jim went to the park with Maggie, Eme went to Piano lessons, and Tom and Joe were home. We had a quick sandwich dinner, then headed off to the baseball scrimmage at 5:15. Jake and Jim and Joe and I. Eme and Tom stayed home.
Mayor Jim Watson is making good on his bet with New York Mayor Michael Bloomberg.
Every time I feel overwhelmed by red tape, I remember photos like this one I recently took when a group of Wounded Warriors were trying their hand at some outdoor range shooting. Part of archery is spending time looking for what didn't hit the target.
Are.You.Kidding.Me??
In any situation where you suspect passive-aggressive behavior, you must begin by taking a close look at yourself and your communication style. This is not to excuse the passive-aggressive in any way, because their behavior is definitely unhealthy, nonproductive and sometimes even hurtful.
Corner Puncher - Marvy Uchida
Under the Terrorism Act, the police are allowed to question suspects for a maximum of seven days.
(3) For all, the righteous and the unrighteous alike, shall be brought before God the Word. For the Father hath committed all judgment to Him; and in fulfillment of the Father’s counsel, He cometh as Judge whom we call Christ. For it is not Minos and Rhadamanthys that are to judge (the world), as ye fancy, O Greeks, but He whom God the Father hath glorified, of whom we have spoken elsewhere more in particular, for the profit of those who seek the truth. He, in administering the righteous judgment of the Father to all, assigns to each what is righteous according to his works. And being present at His judicial decision, all, both men and angels and demons, shall utter one voice, saying, “Righteous is Thy judgment.”
Sure, you could definitely hire a lawyer (make sure it's a literary lawyer, someone who understands the publishing contract), but if you already have agents who are enthusiastic about your voice, this is a good opportunity to start building a relationship. When you interview those agents, really talk to them about their vision for your career, not just their strategy for selling this particular book, although that should be part of the conversation as well.
and muddied tracks. The hounds
Interesting enough! The last part of the story says,
Jim’s two horses standing by the gate.
I used Echo Park's line "Splash" and Becky Fleck's PageMaps for all of these layouts
The BBC interview also draws comparisons between clearing customs and clearing security when passengers arrive at the airport. Waits to clear security are (it is implied) manageable at Heathrow, so why can’t waits for customs similarly be tolerable? (Aside: Why are waits security waits not out of hand? Because the airport operator gets fined if they are not.) There is, of course, a big difference between clearing customs and clearing security. Arrivals to customs are going to be much more peaked. Many passengers from North America fly to London on red eyes. That means many, many planes will be landing at around the same time. In contrast people departing from the airport will not be arriving in batches of several hundred. (We made a similar point in a post about clearing customs at US airports.)
This West Maui Vacation Home is could be yours for $1000 per night…if you do the math you will see it is an excellent deal when compared to hotel properties of the same quality.
Look out the window.
We know how important email effective marketing is for your small business and we know that you don’t have time to learn a complicated program.
Below are some podcasts I now heart, in chronological order of when I discovered them. Better late than never, right?
British entrepreneur Richard Branson, who is worth about $4.2 billion, got into the game in 2004, when he founded the suborbital spaceflight firm Virgin Galactic. Virgin Galactic's SpaceShipTwo vehicle will launch to space after being carried about 50,000 feet (15,000 meters) above Earth's surface by a mothership known as WhiteKnightTwo. Microsoft co-founder Paul Allen announced another air-launched space effort this past December. Allen, who is worth $14.2 billion, founded Stratolaunch Systems with renowned aerospace engineer Burt Rutan. This is the cream of the corporate crop here-- these are not men who fool around or throw their money away. I stopped paying attention to this for a while because it seemed like a indulgence-- space plane rides for the rich in low orbit-- but there are too many players on the field now (Sierra Nevada and their Dream Chaser is yet another player).
To the right of the Ayuntamiento are 2 streets both ending in the Palacio Real and Almudena Cathedral area. The street on the right is Calle del Arenal where you would be tempted to drop by for churros con chocolate at Chocolateria San Gines. So take the road on the left instead. That’s Calle Mayor where you walk past Museo de Jamon ….. Oops.
From my oldest memory I have loved ballet. I remember being three years old and making my dad put my hair in sponge rollers so that when I took them out I could dance like Shirley Temple. I especially loved the ballet part in The Little Princess. I had posters of ballerinas, scores from ballets, and then there were the movies.
Since being reminded of this “rule,” I’ve started reading with an eye toward evaluating how much use these pariahs get in the books that I enjoy. They’re not absent. In fact, they appear frequently in some of the books I like very much. Maybe my tastes are very un-literary. This has led me to believe that we, as writers, should be very careful with these types of “rules,” especially when critiquing the work of others. It is easy to stand with a crowd of self-professed literary types and spout dogma as if it was your own original thought. It is harder, perhaps, to step away from the crowd and see where a writer might be justified in breaking a rule to the benefit of their work.
Next, I added the chopped veggies and the black beans to the meat mixture and sauteed.
My birthday is next week. While I'm grateful for another year of life, it is difficult to turn older!
Friday night my father and I went to an Italian wine tasting that was being held in the city. I think I tried some 20 wines that night! The wines were actually all really fabulous. I say “actually”, because I don’t know much about Italian wines and usually at wine tastings, I feel there’s a mix of good and not so good wines.
He was earlier on Thursday found guilty of interrupting a meeting of national ruling party officials that included President Jacob Zuma.
I don't like how a sewn on label usually looks on the back of a quilt.
And then I heard the words of Rilke, and thought I could not possibly write words of my own that would more more beautifully capture the sense of what I wanted to say here, how I wanted to remember Lily, how I wanted to honor the very human holiness of Daisy's love. And so I finish, with love to both of them and to all of you who have loved and grieved, lost and found:
WITH HANDS, smooth dough into a ball and coat with 1 tablespoon oil
I had to have a long talk with Kerri. I taught her the old saying "sticks and stones may break my bones, but words can never hurt me.". She learned that no one has the power to make her feel bad unless she allows it. And we reinforced just how beautiful her Chinese "looks" are. And then Kerri said: "I don't want to be Chinese, I just want to be Canadian.".
*Live music from the band and choir student
Rightfully the book description says, “The Newsroom Mafia captures the unholy alliance between the fourth estate, the underworld and the government”.
"So, I sat down and read the story, to get a feel for the tone, mood, etc of the novel. I was instantly transported into the world that Lauren Baratz-Logsted created! I wanted to capture the feeling of being from the outside looking in on this classic story of LITTLE WOMEN. At first, most of my cover comps were similar to what had already been tried: they featured images of girls reading, etc. Then I thought it'd be interesting to see the main character sort of 'spying' on the characters in LITTLE WOMEN. I had a few options where a girl pulled back a curtain on a scene of LITTLE WOMEN, but they didn't have the impact I was hoping for. After looking and looking for more 'spying' images, I ended up finding the image on the final cover, the girl popping through a piece of paper. That's where everything started coming together, with the original LITTLE WOMEN artwork and the modern girl coming through the page...."
Layout from a sketch by Jana Eubank. Papers: My Mind's Eye and Basic Grey, Glazed Brads My Mind's Eye, Basic Grey and Bo Bunny, Clocks Heidi Swapp, Chipboard Number and Basic Grey Gold Letter Stickers.
Do you remember me mentioning my problems with shirring elastic? Well I've found a cure and it's brilliant. The lady in John Lewis put me on to it and it's left me wanting to sew elastic thread on to everything. Basically it's a strip of the stretchy stuff and all you do is sew it down while giving the elastic a real hard tug. Leave the fabric well alone and when you let it go after sewing two or three rows it all puckers up.
As previously mentioned I saw The Hunger Games in the theater. I was invited to a special pre-screening event by E-man and we doubled with some of his friends. It was way fun and you'd think that would be the most memorable event of that day, right? Well...not exactly.
So after the sale and my coupon + shipping my grand total was $33.77.
I've always loved this living space that opens up to his and hers office spaces.... It's just so good. Among the million things to adore in this space, two buffalo checked chairs sit and wait to be gawked upon. I will do it. They are fantastic. This pair of chairs really adds a nice level of comfort and ease to the space-- I think there's nothing more easy-going than a slipcovered buffalo check chair... don't you just want to sit down, relax and watch Twilight??? (maybe that last part's just me...)
Looking at the ‘wide swath of Irish poetry’ that Davis chose to include, the selections serve each poet fairly generously as can be expected in the close confines of squeezing four generations into 935 pages (not including notes and permissions). Without doubt there are some exclusions and omissions. Yet, it would have been good to read Moya Cannon, Rita Ann Higgins or Theo Dorgan, for example, not to mention more recent successes like Tom French, Colette Bryce, Kevin Higgins, Paul Perry or Leanne O’Sullivan, to mention a few. I suspect, not that Davis is unaware of these poets, but that the way he cut his cloth was to suit a broad representation across the four generations and some fell by the wayside in selection.
I borrowed my mom's Mirro brand Cookie-Pastry Press to make some spritz cookies; about 15 years ago. Periodically I wonder if she ever gets a craving and then curses me for never having returned her press. For the record, I'm usually really good about returning everything I borrow. Well, except for that hot air popcorn popper she loaned me...
ISBN: 978965229573-6 Price: $34.95 Hardcover, 158 pages
I would further ask this sheikh: What are Muslims supposed to do when they see their rulers become servants for Israel and tools for their own enemies as well as thieves plundering billions of dollars from their people's coffers? Are they supposed to just sit down on their comfortable sofas and watch tyrants violate people's dignity, usurp people's rights and ruin the people's wealth, pending the arrival of the Day of Reckoning?
In fact, I'm going to make a confession here and perhaps puncture an illusion or two in the process. I am not, it turns out, one of those writers who doggedly and determinedly works on my writing every day. Or even every other day. Oh, most days of the week I write SOMETHING--a freelance article, or journal-esque ramblings, or (gulp) a blog post. But I don't sit down every day to work on my WIP.
This is the picture that I created my blog header from, taken at an amazing structure which was built by one of my husband’s cousins, a highly successful and shrewd businessman who passed away not too long ago. We were driving around the city one evening when hubby pulled off a main road and stopped the car in front of this enormous and magnificent development called Altayebat International City for Sciences and Knowledge. The educational facility was built to teach underprivileged children and even houses many of them who are orphaned. It was closed, but even at night the structure itself was quite an interesting sight. Hundreds of oxidized metal antique lanterns provide lighting for the outside. The entire walled-in compound consists of eleven different buildings which are all white with intricate decorative wooden detailing on all windows, doors, facades, balconies and porches painted brown. There is a huge green dome plus several beautiful minarets towering over the buildings. What I was able to photograph was an enormous replica of Old Jeddah constructed along one of the outside walls of the facility. The mini city appears to be made of clay or gypsum and spans an area of about 25 feet wide by 4 feet tall. The charming little village has arched doorways and windows and flat roofs with lots of attention paid to every minute detail for accuracy.
What the bloody hell is it expanding into?
Time to wrap: Cut wrapping twine into 5 ft long pieces and fold in half. Make a loop and knot it in the center where you folded it. Please see picture below for better illustration. The loop allows you to carry and hang the batch of zongzi as you are wrapping and cooking. You can make batches as big or small as you want. In the picture below, there are 10 long pieces of twine folded in half to make 20 loose strings. Each zongzi requires one string so each of our batches had 20 zongzis.
Staying in music and practice is definitely one of the most central aspects today. Every man and white today desires to care fascinating and rest in a stylish experience especially due to the forever maximising sociable parties and events. With more and statesman social parties future every twelvemonth and with the incorporative standardized of living as good, it is principal for both man and oriental to sensing cracking and soul distinguishable sympathetic of trendsetting and trendsetting apparels that straighten a cut to the marketplace and individual fill buying them in an pioneer to be up to date. Make has definitely had a enthusiastic outcome on the minds today. In enjoin to analyze with the fashionable style achievable, it is strategic that shoppers and buyers get crooked on to pattern blog as much blogs and mixer forums enable the someone to jazz what is mitt for them to buy and what is not. It also gives an perceptiveness into the terms differentiation and how the prices can strike the Vogue blogs also earmark the individual to graze polar products beforehand to experience nearly the good property materials of any wear. Examination various apparels at the said time too helps the mortal especially women opt the parcel set the correct value. Today ladies practice is definitely on the locomote and many and many women jazz to class a lot especially on apparels and collection in distinguishable malls as considerably as online portals. The motive to visage the advisable praises is sure not uncharted. Women thusly upgrade to buy the human viable clothing they can and to do so they change to adequately bang every solitary component nigh it. Not exclusive women, but also when it comes to shopping for men, it is crucially grave to experience the finest achievable deals and luxury brands that provide products at a momentous discounted price to enable a worthwhile buy for you. Due to the online boom, we also tally many shopping portals that content products at grease heavy wane of prices amidst wealthiness products and apparels for men and women.
The seas and all that is in them,
07 Walk On The Wild Side
And temptation.
So far we have:
Lou x
4) Make a post in the forum for this contest!!
Even in politics and government – which make no sense at all unless you have the idea of order – the idea of lawlessness is entering. If you look at how the world is divided, you see that almost half of the world now is in the Communist camp. And Communism, if you look at it objectively, is a very strange form of political/economic order, because it makes no sense. As far as politics is concerned, it is tyranny, which the Communists claim to be against. As far as economics is concerned, it does not work, and yet the whole point of installing it is to make it work better than capitalism. Therefore, from the point of view of those who introduced Communism into the world governments, it makes no sense because it does not accomplish what it means to accomplish and because it produces the slave states that Solzhenitsyn writes about very eloquently. And yet it takes over the world. The rest of the world seems to be falling into this, or at least powerless to stop the movement of Communism. What is the reason for that?
Okay folks, I'm going to be gone for awhile.Wanna guess where I'll be? Hint, hint the initials are V. I.
Increases in new orders and production led the way, as the state’s manufacturers continued their rebound from an inconsistent 2011.
I always feel like I don't know how to write "funny." I don't like bathroom humor at all and my published stories/articles have dealt more with death and serious life issues than anything else. These books gave me a great glimpse of unique humor and style, a combination of serious and roll-on-the-floor funny.
I inked the sentiment onto the Label One Spellbinder Die plus the PTI Vintage Label image and embellished it with some Halfback Pearls. At last I added the Aqua Prima Flowers, the PTI Satin Aqua Ribbon with a matching Button and some Vanilla Scrapper's Floss.
Of course, I haven’t been shopping in forever, so when I actually go to a mall… there’ll be a ton of other things to add to this list. Until then,
Last February, during Black History Month, I ran a particularly successful series of daily posts highlighting heroic, inspirational black Americans throughout our nation's history, while it took the NAACP website several days to start highlighting anyone. How do I know? Because I checked their website DAILY to see when they'd catch up to what a white Conservative Tea Party military veteran was doing. For several days the first thing I saw on the front page of their website was a request for donations. Feel free to blow up the picture below, which is a screen capture I took as late as March 1st, showing that same request for money so that they can keep spreading the liberal doctrine of social justice from the ballot box to the classroom....
The situation “is worse today,” said the Rev. Richard Byrd of Krst Unity Center of Afrakan Spiritual Science, near Western and Florence avenues. “From the standpoint of where we ought to be today, we’ve failed to make any progress.”
Thank you NetGalley and Candlewick Press for granting my galley request.
Once they were on the outing, I couldn’t help but see Freda and Brenda as younger variations on the characters Beverly and Angela from Mike Leigh’s 1977 classic play Abigail’s Party, at which Beverly hosts a dinner party for her new neighbours and it goes deadly wrong. Leigh’s play, and the TV staging of it, of course came after this book was written, but I saw it back then when I was 17 and it has stayed with me ever since. It was a kitchen-sink drama relocated to the posher lounge; a comedy that you had to increasingly grit your teeth to get through, as the awfulness of what was happening revealed itself, but you couldn’t help laugh/grimace at. There is much of this grit your teeth comedy in later stages of The Bottle Factory Outing too, and Bainbridge’s true genius is in how she resolves everything and makes us, the reader, complicit in what happens.
In a medium saucepan, combine the milk and cream. Transfer three tablespoons of this mixture to a a bowl and stir in the cornstarch.
On second thought, I think I’ll have to cover this series on a regular basis. And speaking of which, AKB0048 aired yesterday, but I have to blog it for some other time.
Then I got over it.
Whilst we welcome the new funding from the MRC, the areas highlighted for research are not specific enough. How can we ensure that the money is going to go to the right people?
Alex and the rest of the Outlier Recordings group continue their quest to spread as many grooves as possible: the sixth and latest version of their soundcloud-scouring series has officially landed.
Massaro’s proposition gathers force when one views the adjudicative process as a communicative interaction between, inter alia, the state and the accused. As Antony Duff observes:
I once worked with a person who claimed to be an action hero -- SuperWoman, to be exact.
Storming through the doors of her apartment, Diana Bruni (Claudia Koll) is returning home from another night of "happy banging." Walking toward the audience with great fanfare (the music on the soundtrack acknowledges her swagger by giving off an air of feminine bravado), Tinto Brass wastes little time establishing the configuration of the rarefied culo we'll be spending the next ninety or so minutes with, when he follows her into the living room. The fact that he was unafraid to get his camera as close as possible to her bum as she walked toward her destination was very comforting to me. Think about it, we're only five seconds into the picture, and my mind is already at ease. A vision in thigh-high pvc boots, black silk stockings, and a super-short red dress, Diana, who is calling out to her husband Paolo (Paolo Lanza), strips down to her underwear, well, sort of, as she says later in the film, "I'm minus underpants." And her black bra, while giving her the support she needs, is pretty much useless when it comes to providing her with the coverage she needs to go about her day in a non-nipple gawking manner.
By 2001, 56% of all of South Africa’s land already belonged to the State which granted land-use access to some 1-million ‘new black farmers’ and their families. Fourty-four percent of all the land, including in the cities, was in the hands of white people. And at the same time, food-production and the income it generates for the state, has also dropped dramatically:
Somehow, despite the sloshing lack of intellect, I noticed a suspicious character lurking in the doorway of the arriving train. He sported a hoodie in ninety-degree weather. Obvi up to no good. We crossed paths as I climbed into the car. I could almost hear the Dirty Harry pan flute and harmonica.
Here is me and my horse, Freyfaxi.
But at the other end there's silence. Nothing. And then she laughs. "Hey sweetie! Sorry, didn't hear a word of that. Robbie grabbed my phone!"
Feelings? Outwardly expressed?
My children make me smile..
The crash of the Phobos probe, has caused Russia to pull back, temperarly from Mars and reset its sights closer to home. Some say that the crash in the computer systems were caused by bad design, by a rougher than expected take off or maybe even by US EMP pulses. The Americans are notoriously sore losers.
“Doesn’t have a name,” came the reply.
“Hey! What’s your game, then?”
Plus, will there be a breakthrough that could free an American
Any moment with you regardless of context would be precious.
Next up - final Honeymoon post!
Okoshi was an autodidact on trumpet; after studying at Kwansei Gakuin University, he moved to the United States in 1972. In 1975 he completed studies at the Berklee College of Music.
At the moment I'm really into vintage illustrated nature studies; botanical, anatomical, zoological (anything with a 'cal' on the end really!).
What I recommend is that you do it to your blog(s) right now, and store the files in a couple of places. Offer to store a friend's blog, perhaps, so it's disaster-resistant even if their house burns down or is hit by an asteroid.
OBAMA: R-R-Ronnie. I have to say, before you arrived, this Christmas Carol crap was a serious downer. But now, I feel so good about myself. I’m obviously on the right track here, and I’m going to end up being just as popular and revered as you were!
He gathered up his soutane and strode off,
Those of us that are currently trying to live a minimalist lifestyle know that we are probably in the minority.
Remarkable photography has been produced by people using everything from shoebox pinhole cameras to toy cameras, to technical view cameras, through to the latest sophisticated digital cameras. Not having the latest lens or camera is no barrier to producing remarkable work.
I’ll keep you posted on how things turn out next week. Please share any experiences you’ve had dealing with difficult situations and how you survived.
to survive,
Will bobbed over. The Baba Yaga picked him up and gave him a big hug. "It's nice to have you back." She glanced at Sam's father. Her mouth twitched like she was going to say something, but she didn't.
Paolo from The Lost Pages Blog commissioned me to do a color illo for a cover for his Adventure Fantasy Game; I shipped it off to him last week but have been distracted by other stuff; I didn't notice until today that it was up on his site so now I can share it with you.
The first theme was Vintage. Vintage isn't my usual style. If you visit my blog often, you know that I LOVE the fun, cute, whimsical style of stamps. I like vintage, but I guess I just don't feel as comfortable with it as I do with fun and cute. :) For my card I used the Lovely Labels 1 set from GinaK Designs that was created by my Crafty Friends teammate Nina Brackett. I used papers from the Almanac Collection from Prima along with stamps from the Simply Jane set and Simply Jane Die Collection from Papertrey Ink.
“Brandy! Get your ass in here.” Sal yelled, clearly agitated.
Every single manuscript is unique, therefore making its journey unique from the manuscripts before. Each and every story only happens once.
What I love about today's story is that it's real. It shows that with some good space planning and getting creative, IT CAN BE DONE!
It wouldn’t be ours. It wouldn’t look like us, act like us, eat like us, cough in the winter or sneeze in the summer like us, be bad in math like us.
from people to animals,
Chicken for Recipes
These rates are remarkably -- one is tempted to say -- astoundingly low.
The full article by Frank T. Gencarelli
I wasn’t expecting to enjoy it as much as I did. And despite the fact that it went completely against pretty much everything that’s been established by the comic books as far as character histories, I had so much fun watching it.
Arrange the cucumber ribbons around the outside of your serving plate or bowl.
#24 - Heidi @ Mom's Crafty Space - hey Heide, send me an email so we can get designing!
SCC: Finally, I’m always wondering this myself (and am always changing my greedy mind), so I’m going to indulge myself and ask you what your last ever meal in the world would be, if you could choose. Mine currently involves eggs, chicken, truffles, purple sprouting broccoli, asparagus, mashed potato, a lot of cream and butter—and chocolate (obviously). Where would you eat your final supper? And with whom?
Believe it or not, there are strip club customers out there who come in for the bar staff and don't get lap dances. I didn't believe it until I started meeting regular customers who would come in and not once ever leave the bar area. That's right. Not everyone coming into a strip club is looking for a lap dance. I have guys who come in during my shifts every week who chat it up with me at the bar and candidly tell me that they have no interest in the ladies performing on stage.
Here's hoping all the days ahead
Morning everyone I know it has been a while since my last post but you see a lot has happened since then. The same day I did my last post my beautiful Nana who has been battling illness for a few years suffered kidney failure and the heartbreaking decision was made to put her into palliative care. The following afternoon aged 79 years old my Nana lost her battle. My Nana has been a huge part of our lives (as I am sure many of your Nana's have been to you) and I have not taken this very easily. Although we knew it was coming the reality of no longer having her to visit and knowing that she will never walk into a room again is heart breaking.
Certainly you weigh too much. Maybe not a lot, but you could stand to lose at least 10 pounds.
2. God Rest Ye Merry Gentlemen
In other news, I shared a cozy snuggle with Stella this morning. She crawled into my bed. I told her I wanted to stay in bed all day until I poop, that if my colon can go on strike then I can too, go make yourself breakfast, you know where the kitchen is. She thought that was ludicrous.
A spokesperson for the Diocese of Southwark said:
Okay, so I was supposed to have a post prepared for today, however the weekend kind of got away from me. This works out well for you, lovely followers, because it means I'm going to act like I'm on top of things and do a giveaway.
Book Dimension: 5.5 x 8.5
My relatives had also been called on this occasion and they too,I discovered, were getting bugged up.
When I finally got a call through to my mother, I told her what I thought happened, that a Cessna hit one of the buildings. I assured her I was fine and not to worry. As I continued to transfix my gaze, I witnessed the incomprehensible. I told her that the second tower just exploded. The visual impact was so violent and bizarre that I didn't even hear it. The phones went dead. I picked up my things and headed for the door. “Why are you leaving?” one of my colleagues asked.
As a mother you try your very best to be perfect. You want to make sure you are doing everything you possibly can to ensure the brightest future for your children. You strive to make sure they eat well, sleep enough, don't watch too much tv, brush their teeth, learn their manners, and on and on and on. It's a full time job and one I am honored to have.
To which my friend replied:
What if we turned back to go get it if we forgot it?
But my biggest problem honestly is being hysterically mad at myself for getting on the stupid rope bridge in the first place. BELIEVING IT COULD BE BETTER.
In the same shop I eventually came across this book illustrated by Alfred Quinton and I enjoy it as much for the artwork as for the prose. In fact let's be honest here - the artwork is definitely the real reason that I love it!
"You look fantastic."
We applaud the efforts of Brooklyn District Attorney Charles Hynes for conducting his own criminal investigation into the awful death of the Ms. McKay-Dalton. However, Council Member James is also urging Mayor Bloomberg and Commissioner Kelly to carry out a NYPD investigation looking into the circumstances surrounding this terrible accident.
On the broad sands of southern India’s beaches lie thousands of wooden dhows and fibre glass skiffs, plied in trades, legitimate and otherwise, in the Bay of Bengal. On one of these boats, from one of these beaches, two years ago, Rathidevi’s son Dhuuaragan leftIndia, and his life in a refugee camp, bound for Australia. She has not heard from him since. She does not know whether he is alive or dead. Four months after her son left in October 2009, she received a phone call from a number and a voice she did not recognise, telling her her son was in an Indonesian jail. The line then dropped out. ”I do not know who called me.”
As stated in an earlier post, it’s not what one has planned for the day, but what the day has planned for you. With the devil testing my patience, I wondered if a new book of Job was being written!
I texted him and told him - he said that tomorrow it will be happening...he will be owning me. Just typing that sentence makes me squirm and panic just a bit inside...but I want it because I want the calm that comes afterward. I love the part where I'm sitting on his lap, or laying beside him and I feel small but strong and he acts in charge and caring - and we are complete.
“Me and phones.”
We also, as you may imagine, hit a few beer bars in the area. For the most part I'm a die-hard IPA drinker because they are so hopalicious. Unfortunately, they are also big as in 7.8% or 8.6% or even 9% alcohol. Not exactly a session beer. Not exactly a beer that you want to drink on a hot summer afternoon. But, at our 3rd bar, there he was....sitting innocently at the end of a row of taps. "What's this All Day IPA?" I inquired of the waitress (who, luckily didn't seem the type to wipe knives her butt). "Oh, that's a new one from Founder's, out in Michigan, it's only 4.8% alcohol."
pinch sea salt
86. It was just noon that Sunday morning when the sheriff reached the jail with Lucas Beauchamp though the whole town (the whole county too for that matter) had known since the night before that Lucas had killed a white man. —William Faulkner, Intruder in the Dust (1948)
02 Father Cooperates (Young) 4:47
Accessories: Spellbinders Labels 18, Petite Ovals Large, Lacey Ovals, cotton crochet lace, half pearl trim, turquoise seam binding, silver paw charm, foam dimensional
Will be the sweetest sound
Funny how sometimes you can't write straight away about books that have had a deep impression on you - you need time to get to grips with them in a less emotional way. That's the experience that novelist Lisa Glass says she has sometimes, but that those are the books that turn out to be her favourites. I'm thrilled that she counts The Birth Machine as one of those books, and that it now appears, with a simply lovely review, among her four Books of the Year (so far) on Vulpes Libris.
In the final section, dealing with his disappearances and the family’s reaction, I felt that the author was struggling to bring the story to a close. The revelation from Rose’s father, about her grandfather’s special skill and the reason for his own fear of hospitals, felt tacked on, as if the author had suddenly realised she needed to explain all the bizarre things that had happened and produced this as a rather obvious deus ex machina. I thought she threw the explanation away far too easily – if Rose’s father had talked to his daughter earlier in the story, the special abilities could have been explored and the father-daughter relationship developed. As it was, there was little expansion on the family trait and no resolution of the story.
The Harry Potter novels have now sold over 400 million copies worldwide and have been translated into 69 languages. J.K. Rowling has generated huge popular appeal for her books in an unprecedented fashion. She was the first children’s author to be voted the BA Author of the Year, and also win the British Book Awards Author of the Year.
It is alleged that Bronwyn wanted to take the officers' names and was pushed and her hands were smacked.
Professor Rashib: Have you finished the tasks I have given you?
noodles with sesame tofu &
Meanwhile, conditions of life have been inflicted upon us which are already leading to our destruction, at least in part.
I have funds leftover at the end of the week to put in savings.
How did it go? Oh, fine. It went fine. Fine...it's fine it's fine, slightly awkward, I mean just fine. great! fine. The kids are great. Timing is a little off and there's extra time in which Yuna and Mrs. Lee are mouthing "Speaking Time again Conversation Time again Sing A Song again" Okay.
While the Department of Homeland Security claims illegal immigration has dropped to an all-time low the federal agency responsible for protecting national parks is boosting its workforce to prevent “a pathway of destruction” left by undocumented aliens crossing from Mexico.
The mayday 2012 oakland happenstance forced my hand. I wanted to write about the evils of television. I was not near done with that monster. But here I am right in the heart of the great tension in our country. The attention lavished on the occupy movement again has payoff for those operating peripherally to the scene. The copper cowboys have stripped another west or east side apartment, business, church, school, of all its copper plumbing and wiring, to sell off the the tune of black market gold, again. This is a lucrative business for those who have no other way to get through another day on the scraps the well off leave on the sidewalk like treats to be devoured by the first thirsty one to come along. Copper has clear value and is clearly left vulnerable because no one ever imagined this shit being stripped and ripped off, so wow, there is a good example of how times have changed, the public conscience has to get over it and adapt to the new ways.
But for America Singer, being Selected is a nightmare. It means turning her back on her secret love with Aspen, who is a caste below her. Leaving her home to enter a fierce competition for a crown she doesn’t want. Living in a palace that is constantly threatened by violent rebel attacks.
I was going to email these questions to my brother and then I realized how absolutely, insanely co-dependent they sounded.
I'm heading to the Isle of Wight with my boyfriend and puppy and I'm very excited! We've got a little cottage right on top of some cliffs and there are no other buildings around for miles so it's all isolated and pretty, very nice :).
breathing any-lifted from the no
But that’s not the problem. It’s not that I didn’t want to write. I just didn’t want to share it. And after months of trying to crack the code, I finally nailed it, thanks to my dear friend Tricia’s amazing blog about her trip traversing the Grand Canyon. It’s a fabulous read, and it made me realize what I’ve been missing: a sense of accomplishment. Tricia’s post is so triumphant and invigorating, and I’ve been so overwhelmed the past few months with textbook hallmarks of depression: feelings of worthlessness, malaise, raincloud over head that is cured when playing with a kitten or a toddler (that’s what the commercials tell me, anyway). It’s been a rough patch, make no mistake. From May to July, it was like the Universe’s Greatest “Fuck You” Hits was on a loop. I won’t go into the gory details, but suffice it to say that from family to money to health to money to career to money to family again, it was just a little too much for my brainpan to bear. Hence, the rock bottom-ness of the past few months.
7)Pandas come running over to us suddenly, claiming that they'll tell us the secrets and mysteries of Gods & Goddesses. In return, they say, we could give them "as much as our heart felt like."
Paquin
effect;
In this final chapter, Freud calls the ego “the innocent ego.” If the ideas he posits here are accurate, then the ego, indeed, finds itself a victim to the stronger super-ego and id (which tend to work together.) “
I'm into neutral eyes and for that I'm using Dior's 754 Rosy Tan (reviewed here). As a base, Urban Decay's Eyeshadow Primer Potion, which a lot of people seem to love but is nothing special for me - and I hate the way it looks now (= bad packaging!), even though I haven't used it very much. In fact, I think I might throw it out now...
Check out this video that the cast did of the Prologue. It is apparent from their costumes and lack of a set that this must have been recorded early in the rehearsal process. But it is a small taste of the excellent show that follows. I applaud the Milwaukee Rep for producing the type of theatre that should appeal to a much younger audience.
Really, what’s going on here? Why do people pay more for the right to say less?
The Syrphidae/Flower-Fly family hosts countless mimics of bees and wasps.
Just because she’s on a funny dress, doesn’t mean she’s a princess. She’s a seriously confused woman. –Robert (Enchanted)
End of Blog Tagging!
Hope you all have a good week of mail.
According to an Interpublic spokesman, Mr. Mason has not worked at the company “in at least 10 years.”
An important link is one with the Millennium Institute in Washington. They have developed a modelling package called Threshold'21 based on the methodology of system dynamics. They have indicated their enthusiasm for adapting this package to the structure of South Africa's dual economy. Negotiations are under way to involve them in using this for the modelling of the South African economy.
Best News Report
Meanwhile the pro-Europeans find themselves in the same situation as appeasers in 1940, or communists after the fall of the Berlin Wall. They are utterly busted
(This is actually a picture from a year ago, but it gets the point across!)
A few years back, I went to see Schindler’s tree in Yad Vashem. I have always thought that he was definitely a hero of the Shoah … but with a few caveats, of course. Having read Kasztner’s train, however, I now fail to understand what the real difference is between he and Schindler – why one has been honoured, and has been laid to rest in Jerusalem, and why the other was assassinated by members of the same country.
Blogger has a new way to customize your template, so I fiddled with that a bit.
1127 D-XI/14/1991. Celebration of the Bicentennial of the Bill of Rights. Illinois Division, American Civil Liberties Union, Harold Washington Memorial Library, Chicago, Illinois. The invitation to the author to speak on this occasion was withdrawn when it was recalled that he has taken issue with some American Civil Liberties Union positions over the years. Compare Item D-XII/15/1975, above. See Item C-1986(3), above.
Another 7-minute suite to end on again. This iTunes definitely knows I need to get to bed! This one has some nice bluesy/jazzy brass playing in amongst some unusual percussion elements. These percussion elements are quite interesting to hear.
I want to explore this conundrum more closely, but perhaps I’ll do it some other time. I don’t want this post to get too long.
1. First, you need special eggs called fertilized eggs that have the beginnings of a baby chick in them. The eggs we buy at the store for cooking are not fertilized. They do not have baby chicks starting to grow in them. But if you go to a farm that has hens and roosters, you can get fertilized eggs for hatching. At first, the baby chick is very tiny — just a speck inside the egg, but it will grow until it fills the egg and hatches out.
Who the hell is "we" There is no "we" in querying, much like there is no crying in baseball. By this I mean, you're slipping disastrously out of third person and into first person here. This kind of slip is a huge red flag in a query.
1/2 Kiwi fruit (optional), diced
"There tiny!"
Press music button or pull 2 interactive fabric legs to activate fun phrases, nature sounds and soothing melodies
The Russian-French Jewish painter (1887-1985) lived an extraordinary life – truly overcoming all adversity. He grew up without art, to the extent that it was an alien concept to him until he saw a friend drawing. Life for Jews in Russia at this time was terrible, the community suffered from organised pogroms and humiliating segregation – even requiring internal passports to enter the larger Russian cities. I feel that this outer-struggle is one reason why, in his art, Chagall turns his eye inwards, to the spirit,to introspection, to symbolism, and to idealism.
Yesterday, I was driving by one of our local parks here in the Lima suburban district that I call home when I noticed something different in the center of this green space.
Pattered against the tent and our upturned dreaming faces.
Because we’ve got so many Malcolm memories around Red Rooster to explore, let’s not spend much time on the date of the Harlem fundraiser. How important can it be, that on 29 March 1964, at Harlem’s Audubon Ballroom, Malcolm first delivered perhaps his most famous speech – “The Ballot Or The Bullet”?? http://www.vlib.us/amdocs/texts/malcolmx0364.html
I want to write a little something about what happened to me last week and how mark. helped fix it!
Ensemble message: So in case you were wondering, this is what I, as an HR person, chooses to wear as an interviewer. Less formal than being the interviewee, but I still like to wear traditional office pieces (pencil skirt, trousers, cardigan, blazer, etc.) to show respect to the candidates. Now, I wouldn't suggest going overboard as an interviewer... afterwards, you want to properly reflect your company and team's culture. So, in some cases, jeans might be appropriate! As always, remember that the clothes you wear to work are a reflection of you as a professional and also your company.
So, of what did our meal consist? Glad you asked. We started with drinks. The juice from two freshly squeezed grapefruits, St. Germain and vodka. Delicious. Refreshingly Spring-like. Tim makes a mean mixed drink; attending to the details as only an engineer can.
He's my best friend and I can't imagine a day without him
One letter that did arrive on Wednesday contained some stamps and a request for a particular back copy. On Thursday morning I received an email from the writer wondering what had happened to her magazine. At first I thought she was being a bit eager until I checked the postmark – it had been sent sixteen days earlier! It came from interstate (NSW) but I’m sure I could have walked that far in that time…
My birds are coming along slowly....
(That said, I did bump into a creative director who lost his job because I got the agency to pay for a national poster campaign that had a less-than-perfect line break in the legals, but he was fine about it. Well, he didn't say much, to be honest, apart from some stuff about his wife and an operation and losing the house and divorce and rehab, but from inside my BMW, he seemed fine. Sorry - when I say 'bumped into' I mean 'ran over'. Should have made that clear.)
The legislation would move crimes like animal cruelty and dog fighting to Penal Law section of the state criminal code. These charges, and other laws designed to protect animals, are currently listed under the Agriculture & Markets Law section.
I find that I enter a production zone usually. I fully admit the TV goes on if I am on the road with the kids and have arranged for rehearsal childcare but not rewriting childcare. While I think it is fabulous to ruminate on feedback as the writer, you also have to learn to work somewhat quickly, and I always want to make sure that my having my kids with me doesn't impede my ability to get work done. That said, I will usually then make sure I take hours before rehearsal or during the dinner break and hang out with my kids so they don't need AS much therapy when they are older. Working at La Jolla was wonderful because their artist housing has pool access. I would race back from the theater, give the sitter a two hour break, and get in "the hot pool" with the kids (they were obsessed with the jacuzzi and I'd set the timer so we didn't overheat, and play in and out of that tiny pool until it was time to get ready for the evening).
I was inspired by the cute cowboy on this card of Neva's and in true Neva fashion my card incorporates multiple challenges! My super hero is a digi imge from Mo's Digital Pencil called 'Ta Da' from the Super Kid set. My sentiment is from Half Pint Heroes by Waltzingmouse . I colored the image with Copics, die cut it with a circle Nestability, sponging it with Mustard Seed distress ink before taking it out of the die. I layered it to a pinking circle Nestability. I cut the red star patterned paper with Tim Holtz Rosette die and layered it over the bottom strip. The background is embossed with Square Lattice from SU.
Event Participation
The need to guard against money laundering received new impetus in 2004 when the Hong Kong Monetary Authority urged banks to be especially alert to the possibility of money laundering as the territory prepared to become an outlet for yuan-denominated deposits.
Edit 3: Omari explained to me that many of the kids are very scared to re-enter the home; scared that the attackers are still inside "waiting with knives". So it was nice to see them playing (and eating oranges) outside in the yard.
I shot a 487-11x with the Glock 17, my best score yet, and a 455-22x with the Glock 19. Not sure why the Glock 17 outperformed the Glock 19 this time.
What is your favorite color and why?
1 Bulb Garlic (peeled and crushed)
if the end justifies the means, i don’t think i deserve what i was literally handed. forgive me, for my mistakes. believe me, when i apologize. i had bar celona over heritage row, i had a beach company dinner instead of starbucks; instead of downing whisky on the rocks and getting shit wasted, i lit up one stick .. it comes down to the choices we make at the end of the day, therefor i made them in reference to you. and i still don’t know what i’ve done wrong.
Day 2 - Feb 2
And BAM! I had glimmer mist!
I have been seeing the Hunters everywhere
Each week we will pick a winner from the palette participants, and announce them the following week, when the next Pretty Palette Challenge is announced.
design and she does very well with kid's rooms as
You can make of your life anything you wish.
Dogs also carry a large medical responsibility. After birth, they require a series of shots. Some vets differ in the delivery of these, so ask yours. They will then set up annual visits in which some of these vaccinations are repeated. It is vital that they keep up with these each year. It is also important that you keep the paperwork, and they wear the dog tags stating that they are up to date.
The boys started school last week. It is weird to think of Chris as an eighth grader. Eighth grade is so grown up. Next year is high school, after that will be college, mission, and adulthood. It is going too quickly for me. I really like where we are as a family right now. We have Chris at thirteen, a good young man, hard working, smart, and not quite into his teenage surliness (I hope he never gets there). Sam, at ten, still innocent and wide eyed, loving the world, and asking questions about everything. Marcus is seven, still enough of a little boy to crawl around with Noah, but enough of a big boy to ride the bus and read chapter books. And then Noah, three years old, cute, outgoing, funny, rebellious. I tell people that he is a brat with just a hint of pride. It is wonderful to have four different ages of childhood in our home, and I am going to miss leaving each stage (except for diaper changing) as they grow.
These appear to be rather decent quality toys. They are all plastic so unlike Hot Wheels and such there is no die cast body but considering they are still in one piece after what has probably been close to a decade sitting in a box that has taken on a slightly less “box-like” shape is a testament to how solid they must be. They are a little bit smaller than you average How Wheels/Matchbox car and paint apps are minimal for the most part. All in all I would be pretty happy to get this in my meal if I were a kid.
Shall their great effort be made all in vain?
and through your only Son
Child #4: "Never quit."
The choice is very simple and easy to make; we the British people live under the shadow of Almighty God, the Living God of Israel, and He will never allow you to succeed in your Jihad against us and our Christian homeland and has begun to raise up a modern Christian army of Godly Knights from amongst us with a mandate direct from heaven to stamp out your Al Qaeda inspired fire of Jihad that is now burning brightly across our land within the confines of your Islamic Kingdom. Your delusional leaders forget about the glorious history of our people and the legendry Christian Knights that arose from here many centuries ago during the times of the crusades whose exploits have reverberated gloriously throughout history to the present day. Your Islamic leaders have set each of you out on a frivolous suicidal war path that you cannot achieve or fulfil.
When he heard about what happened in Derry on Bloody Sunday, John decided to return to Derry and join the Republican Movement and became a member of ‘B’ company of the 1st Battalion of the IRA’s Derry brigade.
Born on today's date, Charlie O'Brien.
The winter feels less cold
Just wanted to share my excitement with you! And I promise next time I blog it will be something less self-absorbed/focused on my book in particular.
Above you see what I've been working on. I've been very prolific artistically these past three days. Inspiration is hitting on all sides. I keep getting more and more ideas. It is wonderful. I am setting up an etsy shop too.
I push words around on the page like peas I don't want to eat.
Enter European H&M, which is superior to the U.S. H&M because they carry merchandise that the U.S. doesn’t, like this:
Furthermore, the tactics and character of the rebel movement seems dramatically different than the uprisings elsewhere in the region, particularly in Egypt and Tunisia. In Libya, the movement lacks the inspiring quality of nonviolence, human solidarity, and social/political demands for justice. It was violent from the outset, tribalist in spirit, recipient of weaponry from external actors, preoccupied with control over the oil-producing areas, indistinct in political outlook (a rebel segment flying the pre-Qaddafi flag of the Libyan monarchy), and uncertainly linked to private sector international oil interests. This looks more like a struggle for control of the state or possibly an effort to establish a secessionist second state if a stalemate emerges. Under this mix of circumstances one must be suspicious about the focus on Libya and the call for full consideration of military options. It would seem to be the case that if feasibility hurdles could be overcome, the political climate in the United States and Britain would support a large-scale intervention, possibly with Arab regional acquiescence. See illuminating analysis by Michel Chossudovsky, “Insurrection and Military Intervention: The US-NATO Attempted Coup d’Etat in Libya?” www.globalresearch.ca March 8, 2011.
Back then, the gas prices were all George W. Bush's fault and proved the cronyism between him, Cheyney and their oil buddies.
now he rides that
People even in this day and age find walking hard, Yes that’s right walking – the thing you could do when you was a baby. Imagine this, You weigh 16 st or 101kg or 222lbs (by the way that’s me) and your walking, its not walking that’s the problem its the sweating. You may know how embarrasing that is when you walk up to someone. They’re talking to you all happy and there you are sweating like a pig – and what if they smell you hmm?
Then there was Denise Van Outen who was caught bottle feeding her baby. Or it might have been someone else. And was judged for it.
As I said, Ram Gopal Varma has usually shown that he loves his characters, perhaps Nishabd is a shining example of that. Perhaps he loves those ones more who do smile but aren’t really happy deep inside. Inside they are lonely, they are afraid and they just hope that things will be fine, and they don’t. Nothing really will happen until there is a diametric change and that does happen, and to let it happen they don’t stop or run away but keep on going, until they realize that stupidity has happened and it is too late.
that was saturday.
And this is today's outfit. We cleaned some today, did school and worked on some stuff.
We left a little late (as to be expected!) and at that point I felt like I was in fancy dress! It was such a strange experience. I felt like I was getting into the Chitty Chitty Bang Bang car and should start singing or something! By the time we got to the church and I could hear the bells ringing, I begun to feel like a bride, in fact, i felt more beautiful than I have ever felt in my life. Putting a dress on like that and getting your hair and make up done definately does wonders for your self esteem!
Does that mean that whoever drinks a glass of wine is going to hell? Of course not, but if you are an alcoholic and you are tempting yourself with wine that leads to other things then you may be sinning.
…Mettler realized she discovered her own tomboy style while at boarding school, trading clothes with her frilly best friend Kingsley Woolworth, who favored bubble-gum pink bed linens and diamond stud earrings. By borrowing some of Kingsley’s things and mixing them with her old favorites, many of them borrowed from her older brother, Mettler found her own style vocabulary, epitomized by a shirtdress cinched with a men’s ribbon belt.
as we also have forgiven our debtors.
Forgive the sexism – and remembering the always-entertaining Rumble in Ranelagh – but you would have to wonder how Treasury came up with a codeword – TAIL – for what looks like a controversial financial transaction in 2010 in which €20m of shares in a company called China Real Estates Opportunities (CREO) were transferred out of the Treasury group to the apparent benefit of Johnny Ronan and Richard Barrett in return for €100,000. NAMA has been trying to reverse this transaction for some time.
#2. I’ve been craving a hot chocolate the past two days. Extra marshmallows of corse!
After a few hours, Mom would rustle the kids back inside, where we would start our goodbyes, a process that often took an hour or more. Mom would keep gently telling Grandma we needed to go. Like those performance artists whose movements are imperceptible to the naked eye, we kids would back up ever-so-slowly toward the front door. "No need to rush off," Grandma would always say, and Mom would say she needed to get home to start dinner. No matter how long we stayed, Grandma always wanted us to stay a little longer.
I have something MUCH simpler planned for my Daughter's MDO teacher and the bus driver. I will be working on these soon.
If you have decided on your colour palette for the wedding, you should have a good idea of what colour your bridesmaids will be wearing. At that point, it is time to choose the bridesmaid dresses. Some women, when they think of a bridesmaid dress simply cringe, however with today’s new styles with charming ruffle trims, floral embellishments, flattering necklines, varied hemlines, and scope of fabric, there is no need to worry.
Eldane - Stephen Moore
Stops to steering must limit riders hands from touching the fairing
have no longer exists as all it takes
A Chinese national and Singapore PR Zhang Yuanyuan who worked as a teacher in a private institution in Singapore revealed to the media that she became a PR within 2 months of application.
I'm not going to "award" 15 bloggers as the "rules" suggest, because I would love anyone who comments to feel free to do this themselves! I love getting to know all of you through fun little posts so please feel free to reference myself or Eesh if you want to play along!!
When I am losing myself out of will to support others?
RIGHTS2WRITE
When composing your image in the viewfinder of the camera, you want to place your subject in a third of the area. You do not want to place your subject or focus point directly in the center of the picture unless it is more effective that way.
4. Sequence 04 (00:36)
It seems, in certain circumstances, how we frame our pain can genuinely alter the physical, embodied experience of it.
3. Structure (The Mind)
My nieces positive feedback
Overall: I think the beer came out pretty tasty and went over well with friends and family. On the next batch (Baptism Robot Ale) I'm going to try for a lower FG and a little more carbonation. It'll also be my first partial-mash brew.
5 days until pre-season starts. Looking forward to it.
Overall, this beer was a miss for me. The malt sweetness was heavier than I personally enjoy, and I would have liked to see some more body on the mouthfeel. This wasn't really the hop-bomb that the bottle said it was going to be.
And I felt it more recently when I found myself in the reverse role of caretaker. My aging and cantankerous cat Puss needed fluids administered through the skin on her back. Each time I prepared to pierce her flesh, I repeated my new mantra, "It's only skin. It's only skin." When I managed to jab the needle and then hold her still for five minutes (with the help of my friend Anna), I felt a sense of relief. The second time, when I did the deed solo, I felt a genuine sense of accomplishment.
~ Wislawa Szymborska
See, I like the milk with my Chips Ahoy cookies very cold and the old Amana model we inherited from the previous owners of the house we now live was having a hard time keeping a constant temperature. Throw in the door handles that were loose and cracked, a freezer that produced enough frost to create a glacier forcing us to defrost about every two weeks, and even a Bachmann supporter would have had enough sense to know it was time to buy a new one.
Then I met with another guy this afternoon, again another beautiful place, but wow was he a bit odd. I asked about internet – my one prerequisite for moving into anywhere, and you might surprised how many places in Australia don’t have it – and he was all “yep, there’s the modem over there” so I looked at it, looks fine, then he says “I don’t have wireless though. I don’t like wireless. It works quicker plugged in”.
18. It is beyond the time when fear can refuel the dark ones among you who feed on fear energy, or can detour or delay Earth’s ascension journey. However, fear still has a potent role in the destiny of individuals. With unconditional love, we urge you to develop your capacity for discernment and go within for answers. Whether you think of this as reaching your higher self, godself, inner knowing, God Himself or any other designation you may call this “voice,” it is your soul, wherein all truth is known, communicating with your consciousness.
In what would be called an “ambitious social media campaign,” KLM Royal Dutch Airlines is introducing a new social media service that allows passengers to pick who they sit next to based on their LinkedIn & Facebook profiles.
End Day One.
Though the film does have some tense moments, effective scares and is interesting for the fact that it shows West was interested in evoking horror’s past from the very beginning of his career, it is for completists only. West’s second film, Triggerman, is much the same. Though at least it’s slow paced, naturalism is more fitting for its story of a group of hunters stalked in the forest by an unseen sniper, than The Roost’s KILLER BATS scenario.
Before beginning my South American bike tour I asked the same question to experienced rider and inspirational author Andrew Morgan of Teacher on Two Wheels. This was his response:
After a stop for a late lunch, and some shopping we finally made it to Mom and Dad’s in time for dinner with them. Why did we make a usual 4-hour trip into an 8-hour trip – you may well ask! The stop at Osoyoos was to pick up this little gem:
January 3, 2010
If you really feel that
The music is spread across the 4 TDK SA60 sides as follows:
I am entering this card into the current Delightful Challenges contest. I have inked up a stamp from my last Magnolia Club issue. It's Edwin and he is carrying a parcel through the snow and I have coloured it using my Copics. The paper is from a Nitwits Collection. The snowflakes are cut using a Cuttlebug die. The Cosmic Shimmer Glitter, jewels, glitter and ribbon are all from my stash.
The Association on American Indian Affairs is looking for a Development Officer! The position is part time (28 hours/week) and the location is negotiable.
Now it's quiet. Bored, bored, bored, b o r e d.
Adopt or sponsor an orphan.
another premix from Bake King... green pea cookies. actually, i have never tried green pea cookies before... i like the coated green peas, as in the nuts itself... but it was only this year that i saw green pea cookies out in the market... think i am such a 'mountain tortise'! haha! i was hesitant to get this packet of premix coz it calls for either groundnut oil or shortening... but my colleague, J, was saying green pea cookies are nice, so i decided to give it a try...
Elder Bateman swore he heard something about sons but they didn’t
Regardless, they were divine. Little pieces of Paris.
If you want to watch this movie I suggest you do so without reading much more about it. Don't even read the DVD cover or the Netflix description. Just make sure you find "Midnight Clear" with Stephen Baldwin, and not something else because there's another movie called "A Midnight Clear" and that's not the right one. And you may not want to watch it with young kids. This is not a traditional feel-good movie, and the depressing beginning may be too much for some people to take. I watched it one year with some of our older kids, and they weren't even sure they liked it. But maybe they'll give it another try sometime. . . . We bought the DVD this year, so let me know if you want to borrow it.
Jim Welling’s career spans several decades and during this time, he saw photography move from an underappreciated secondary art form to a theoretical sparring partner for painting and sculpture. He then saw photography’s subsequent demotion to an informational bullet point in conceptual projects and the subject of photography (that thing or scene in the world) reduced to a shaky falsehood used for political gain. After, there was the rise of digital imaging, new printing techniques, face mounts, and engineered framing systems. Now the digital methods leave many cold, and many young artists seek a higher purpose for photography. For that, they turn to history, all those crazy photographic inventors of the 19th century and Jim Welling who, through it all, has ceaselessly experimented and practiced a photography independent both its journalistic and critical uses. He has played with photography, confident that its quality as an object makes it worthy enough of interest and exciting enough to be consistently groundbreaking.
There you have it. Those are the highlights of my week.
OK, besides the Canon EOS Rebel XSi Digital SLR camera that I got almost 2 weeks ago (and which I used to take this photo), the next best Christmas gift is probably the Spring/Summer 2009 issue of the Grace Ormonde Wedding Style magazine!
Courtroom
Alison xo
You may recall that she has had a Roger Whittaker Simulator strung round her neck for years. (See previous post Whistle).
We were mostly college-age folks, clean-cut and with cheerful dispositions.
- Anabell
That's actually a state-by-state thing. You know, I'm a journalist, or at least I was, I'm kind of a recovering journalist now. I think it's actually state by state.
Calls to boycott Apple products, will not hurt Foxconn – they make (or at least assemble) almost every brand name piece of electronic equipment sold in the Western world. So on a like for like swap, they’ll always get your business. And if you decide that because of this – you’ll move to non-brand generic equipment, then they’ll be manufactured in the real horror sweatshops – where labour laws are ignored, where there aren’t 10,000 HR professionals and counselors on call (that’s right Foxconn employed that many support staff when suicide figures hit the news – I don’t think France Telecom put as much resource on their problem) and where there are no annoying first world journalists sneaking around for a non-story that they can sensationalize.
14) WOLFMAN – Randy Fuller
I got a little diverted by the Hero Arts stamp set (below) that arrived from Simon Says Stamp on Friday morning and hey presto - a Mother's Day card was born!. I won the set recently on SSS - part of their National Craft month celebrations.
Suggestions: Build through the draft and stop participating to all the no-sense trades. Junel Baculi is a very good coach. Give him the pieces.
A friend of mine is due with her baby (girl) around the beginning of February and she had an extra baby thermometer which she gifted to us.
CFR Director George E. Rupp is the dean of Harvard Divinity School
1 package (12 oz) of fresh cranberries
It was an absolutely lovely day! On the way home we stopped in the town of Canmore (the first town heading into the mountains along the Trans-Canada, or in our case, the last town before heading home) for a walk around and a small shopping break. I wouldn't be so pushy to mention this, but Mr. Confessions found a wonderful treasure for me at an antique shop. Now, since it's dark and the lighting is bad, you will have to wait until daylight when I can take some proper pictures....
Ah, well. I kinda like power cuts. Living in the village I always keep a mini-Maglite and a stack of candles to hand. Pretty soon the house looked about as Christmassey as it gets around here and I was happily tucked up under a duvet in the big chair reading Dickens by candle-light.
And though it is just marketing....
Anyone in the world can have anything they want…but they have to be willing to WORK for it. Jim Carrey, he wanted to be an actor prior to his success; do you think he just walked to Hollywood and was instantly given a job? No! He worked for it. He spent months being depressed, frustrated, and on the verge of giving in because it was a tough battle. Do you think all of the wins Muhammad Ali achieved were easy? If so, then you try getting your face pounded in every time you want to make your living!
Fortunately, in the United States, we get to decide that for ourselves.
I hope you pass this on. Tell him to feel free to call or better-yet, post it on my Facebook page (http://www.facebook.com/cparobbins) if he has additional questions to his specific situation. There are many others that have similar issues, and may appreciate the information online there as well.
Your search for love ALWAYS begins WITHIN! What is it that you truly want? What makes you happy? Are you happy on your own? If you’re unhappy on your own, a relationship isn’t going to make you happy. You can’t hand this responsibility over to anyone else. It’s ALL YOURS! Find your happiness, and love will find you. Find your worthiness, and worthy men will chase you.
So I wanted to make zero waste. But had no idea how. :)
They gave me a phone call saying that the fans might even faint and be panic LOL
A perfect example of what can be achieved when Science Fiction cinema is approached in a serious and mature manor is the 1951 classic "The Day The Earth Stood Still". Made in the early 50s, before the atomic monster boom and sensationalised alien invasion films became the staples of the genre, "TDTESS" is arguably the best Science Fiction movie ever produced.
To those women who are torn between their careers and their desire to have a family, I would suggest putting your desire for a family first. If you still want that career after you’ve had kids, it will still be out there for you to have. But if you let your desire for a family fall to the wayside, you may wake up one day and find it’s no longer an option for you and that your career can’t fill that void.
“It’s constantly on repeat in my mind. Not sitting quietly in the unused reservoirs hidden deeply in the power lines of my brain, but playing as the main attraction; high definition and surround-sound included. I know it’s been twenty-two years but…”
And, if that wasn't enough, a new blog will be coming your way from me. But I've learned my lesson. So flash52 seems much more manageable!
In the beginning of the Middle Ages in the 7th century the Visigoths came from the east of Europe and concurred Valencia. They build several churches and spread the Catholicism.
Whether I approve of Twitter or not, it’s a very neat article.
Weregoat are similar to Archgoat, in that they play vicious, bestial black metal with a thrashy edge and they sport names like Indiscriminate Impregnator, Nocturnal Hellfuker and Sadoseducer. They've only released one EP so far, called Unholy Exaltation of Fullmoon Perversity. If you enjoy blasphemous black metal with vocals so drenched in reverb that they sound like a pack of hellish fiends throwing a party in a cave, Weregoat should be right up your alley.
3 foam
A5 size so I could easily slip it into my handbag with my diary for trips to the city etc.
The previous tenants of the store we are renting was a florist. She left a lot of stuff behind - some we are able to use and some we just threw out because of the tackiness factor.
Kentucky Common Beer
It also brought an ache. Memories of love and of special places that are etched in the heart forever. Beautiful seasonal river flowing through lush green valley surrounded by mountain ranges, favorite spots under the trees, a food stall which now doesn’t exist, the aroma of hot tea . The songs and much more that is now lost in time.
Despite wiseass critics like me making fun of her, Sue has survived in a business where we will never forget what's-his- or her- name. What is the secret of her success?
Lawrence Auster writes more frankly and more cogently than almost anyone else on issues concerning Islam, immigration, and race. As he and almost anyone unlucky enough to be interested in reading this knows, the discussion of such subjects in “polite society” is heavily constrained by political correctness (PC)—a hypocritical and stealthily imposed code of conduct propagated by pundits in academia and the media, and unthinkingly adhered to by nearly everyone else. Auster violates PC daily, and he does so by appealing to reason and history. He points out the many threads that connect events to the liberal influences and responses of “polite society”. This is why his opinions are valuable. And this is why I am disturbed that he doesn’t write more frankly and cogently about another issue related to all these others: Jews.
The color they have worn, and John Wayne has truly sworn to never really meet
I’m still jaded from last season.
Thankfully, Jui’s dad was fine, and was kept in for observation only. Jess, though, was not so good. X-rays revealed a large tumour on her liver and I had to get her to Dewsbury immediately to have a CT scan. This also necessitated getting Sharon home as soon as possible whilst trying to not freak her out. I did OK at that but, in the end, had to drive up to BRI to get her and we all went off.
But then the light bulb went on when I was thinking of how I could still wear the shirt and not be paranoid about the bleach stain. BIB NECKLACE!! Duh! They go down far enough to cover the neckline! Now I need to find the perfect one! Here are some fun ones!
LB: Leighton Baines (Everton) – David Moyes deserves a lot of credit for what he has done with Everton this season. To me, they (along with Swansea & Norwich) have been the real feel-good story of the season. Leighton Baines, and specifically his work getting forward and completing crosses, has been a big part of why Everton has succeeded this year.
Merchandise is "as is" and no alterations available
its own.
Thursday evening I had a bachelorette party for my friend Joy.
Most Inspiring Blogger Award:
As some of you may know, I'm taking part in a designer consignment sale, which opens for business tomorrow.
Some people claim that Armageddon will commence on December 21, 2012. I feel that people who claim this need to strongly reconsider what the Bible says. The world must first go through the seventieth week of Daniel before the Battle of Armageddon can occur. For December 21, 2012 to be the date when the Battle of Armageddon occurs, the seventieth week of Daniel must have begun in 2005. You would be very hard pressed to find many Bible believers who believe the End Times began in 2005, including those who believe that we are living in the End Times right now. Therefore, the world will not end on December 21, 2012.
March 14: SG 1.01, re rack and primed.
I still don’t talk to people much about EC as it is kind of awkward and I’m shy about it — I don’t know why! I don’t tell people what I am doing when I take the baby to the bathroom, but if they happen to inquire I or my husband answer and they always get a weird, surprised look on their faces. I know they think I’m kooky. Cloth diapers are already out there — but a baby who pees on cue is beyond fathom. But that’s okay. I know this can be done! It’s not a lot of investment of time when you compare it too how long it takes to clean poop out of nooks and crannies. It does require attention and commitment. I do about 2-3 loads of diapers a week, but I change her immediately even for a minor dampness and even though I miss more pees, I catch almost all the poos–and just that makes it worth it. Taking cloth diapers on and off is a pain but I don’t feel confident in losing them yet.
As Percy Bysshe Shelly said of Ozymandias in the eponymous poem -
I will be very up front and admit that I have very little tolerance for that variety of soft-minded new age pabulum where misguided wannabe-sages and errant advice-givers like Wayne Dyer and Paulo Coehlo are trying to convince people to give up guilt and anger.
The February challenge over at Have the Cake was to make a Romeo and Juliet cake. Romeo and Juliet refers to the pairing of guava paste and cheese, so I thought a guava cake with cream cheese frosting sounded delicious. I did cupcakes because, well, I love cupcakes and they're easier to share.
The best part of the weekend however, wasn't the amazing food, or the delicious Chateau du Petit Thouars wine provided, or even the post-dinner dance party that the Brits weren't quite drunk enough to participate in.
Long drives can help, and I find that drives in heavy, high-speed, freeway traffic work best--for some reason, knowing that it's life-endangering to make so much as a note seems to encourage the subconscious to become especially fecund.
In that moment of trusting surrender, we realise that the far side of the desert is not actually a forsaken exile but a sacred and Holy place where we can meet with God.
I remember being in high school and being teased about my weight incessantly. Because of this, I learnt that you should never ever judge a book by it’s cover. Ok, so someone might be what is deemed “fat” but they may have had a wicked sense of humor, been a great friend or been just like me, craving acceptance that their belly wouldn’t let them have. I don’t tease or belittle anyone for their size because I know that being big is not always a choice.
Much of getting published is about being discovered. Her death means Margaret continues to be undiscovered.
The Mutes Brothers Isn't It Neat Being Unique? (Part One) track listing
I've used papers from the "Everyday Poetry" collection by Webster's Pages to set the stage for my color scheme. In truth, the "Clean & Simple" papers in this collection at first didn't appeal to me...but after using them here I must say that I love them!
5.Those Draftin' Blues
And God looked at him and said, “Have you lost your hearing?”
We talked about many different kinds of homes. There was another cat, this one a tortoiseshell, and I must admit that I charmed her (the cat). A small point of pride. I said, “The place is perfect.”
Greece?*
One of the things I really wanted for Christmas was Anne Burrell's cook book, Cook Like a Rock Star. As a matter of fact anytime anyone asked what I wanted, I named this cook book. It got to the point where hubby was getting annoyed with me. So if you can imagine Christmas morning when I opened the package to hubby and I from J and saw it was the one thing I REALLY wanted. After looking through this book and the other two we received, I decided to use this recipe to prepare the Brussels sprouts I was going to make for dinner. And these sprouts are amazing. The longer you let them brown in the pan, the better they taste. J and hubby loved them, Rigby being Rigby does not eat Brussels sprouts, no matter what. The walnuts added a pleasant surprise and crunchy to this dish. Since I didn't have pancetta in the house, I substituted in the same amount of bacon. Again, these sprouts are spectacular.
A moment of silence followed while the agent’s eyes tried to pierce Nik’s visor. Then, obviously coming to some conclusion, laughed and nodded once. “Okay, then,” he said, clapping his hands. He turned and scooped something up off the desk and tossed it down to Nik.
Sixteen different blogs all with Girl Land inspiration for you to enjoy...
Prescription-drug overdose deaths in Ohio inched downward last year for the first time in 10 years, reports the Columbus Dispatch. Four fewer people fatally overdosed in 2011 than in 2010. While the statewide decline is small, more than half of Ohio’s counties saw a reduction – including virtually all of southern Ohio, considered the heart of the problem.
I have had so much fun making all these paper lollies and I thought it would be fun to glue them all together to make a wreath. The lollies were a little time comsuming, but I just put in the audio book for the Heretic's Daughter, which by the way is interesting and quite sad.
Maybe it’s all been said up to this point. Maybe tomorrow I will wake up and remember the volumes of things I have to tell you. For right now I will have to direct you to some of the most famous words uttered in the history of mankind. Please think them over while you wait for a much more comprehensive post from me tomorrow.
anyway, here's part 3. i'm currently trying to figure out how to get these three on the mailer. i'm very guilty of not having the card design in mind first, but oh well.
Karen Eeuwens – Businessweek, 01/31/2012
thoughts that were a moment still,
The cabin scene from the "Alpine Bungalow" set was stamped onto a card front. I wanted to add the fence from the "Palisade Farmstead" but needed some things in front of it. I stamped the rock from the "Scenery Builders" set; and the Mushrooms and Flowers from the "Woodland Growth" set, down on the bottom of the scene. In order to fit in the fence, I used a craft knife to cut around the top of the rock and around the purple flowers so I could place the fence behind them. The fence from the "Palisade Farmstead" was stamped using VeraFine Brown ink, colored by sponging with Distress Ink then swiping over it with Distress Stain "Picket Fence" to give it an "aged" look. These stains have a sponge top and are so easy to swipe and get the coverage you want. The fence was die cut using the matching Spellbinders die. There is also additional grass, from the "Scenery Builders" set, stamped behind the fence. I stamped the mushrooms a second time and cut out just the tops so they would be dimensional in front of the fence. Before placing the fence behind the flowers and rock, the images were colored using Copic markers. The Windmill, from the "Barnyard Elements" set was silver embossed and cut out with the matching Spellbinders die. The corners were die cut using the Spellbinders "Antique Frame" die set.
I nod, and smile at him. As a conversation, it wasn't as bad as I was expecting. The last time we had this row – which was something like five days ago – he'd stormed off in a huff.
A Silent Storm
Along with this feature, the app also allows a professional to write deposition summaries. A lawyer can also change the font size and color of the files they are reviewing through this app. To help a lawyer remember when they started reading, the Mobile Transcript has a time capture feature that logs the amount of time spending reading a transcript or deposition. This makes it much easier to have the billable time available to a client. This time log can be exported from the online version to a PDF or Excel file. This app allows one to be more productive, especially during travel. The Mobile Transcript is a worthwhile device a legal professional should consider employing.
